My wife and daughter
this post
Sadly, you are probably right. To me, it looks perfectly concise. Who am i, a dyslexic, to judge though, eh'?
Then when would they reveal the rest of the character trailers? During September when the game comes out?  That doesn't make any sense.
sounds like fun if you down i am
Awesome! I'll be sure to bring some decks then. PM me some time so we can share contact info? :D
I take it you're not English, but wanker doesn't mean penis. It originally meant a person who masturbates, now just an offensive term like 'asshole' or w/e.
You realize that you need resources to live, right?
The English Word Woman is not derived from a Hebrew term, yet alone their religion. 
Poor choice in response videos.
/r/photoshopbattles material must be at least 600x600 pixels. :(
&gt;My negative comments are perfectly at home in this negative subreddit  As I said this sub is far far more positive than negative, and you are simply adding to any negativity rather than improving anything. If you truly think this place is more negative than positive you are either placing too much weight on what some people say or you are selectively remembering comments. Or you are just shit stirring. I don't really mind whichever it is, I am just saying that your approach and attitude do nothing to improve what you see as a negative sub.
I was agreeing with you
I think this is a reference to the band Ocean Colour Scene
More like Jeter GIDP 4:6-3 *amirite*?
* Driving very fast / High Gs (I make sure not to do it when others are in danger)  * Orgasms  * Music  * Sleeping with my pets / partner (if I had one :[ )  I have some more specific ones that don't come to mind* immediately.
I second.. AMMO troop here
Lol I meant about my crush. :)
Alright my man, I got some advice for you:  1. If you don't already start working out. When I was a freshman in highschool, this helped build my confidence dramatically. You notice yourself get in shape and you feel like you look good.  2. You're 17, most likely you're a senior in highschool. So you know what, fuck what everyone else thinks of you(except maybe your gf lol). I know this is easier said than done, but trust me it's worth it.   3. See a therapist if you are able to  4. I get your mom verbally abuses you, but based on what you're telling me I don't know if she cares about you or doesn't. Would you say your mom loves you(personal question I know) becaus if she does TALK TO HER. Hell even if you think she doesn't care about you talk to her anyways, she might have a hard time expressing her feelings idk I'm no psychiatrist.   5. Don't have much advice on your gf situation, I personally suck at relationships. But you know, she sounds like she cares about you and all girls are different. Just because a few girls cheated on you doesn't mean she will.   Hopefully this all helps, if you need any more advice or have any questions just respond or PM me!
Peasants? Is because its on console? 
Don't ride too much with them in there. A mess when it rattles around, gets cut and leaks. 
Fair enough. Thanks for the detailed responses and explanations. I appreciate it.
Oh, definitely. Pirates and seafarers didn't all rock long nappy hair, haha :)
Oakland Harley is putting Daymakers on all of them, too. Was in there a couple months ago, and one CHP guy was buying one for his bike. Two months later, they all have them. Nice bikes.
That's about the single most useless statement I've seen on this subreddit.    First off, any generation of voters would be the change, not just the young ones. Add that only about half of the US population that's eligible to vote actually does so, and you're looking at a pretty massive tip of the scales if that power was mobilized.    Second, there would be survival. More people would realize that Congress isn't a bunch of idiots. Further they are a collection or largely two teams, not one that just fucks around. They might also realize that Congress is usually in dead lock and "gets nothing done" (a funny statement, because they get a hell of a lot done, actually) because you have the two sides butting heads.    Scientific information honestly doesn't mean shit in Congressional interest for the most part anyway. Yes, global warming, conservation, food and safety concerns (I can't help laughing a little about this topic because they're so deregulated today that we would literally have companies who must report their own fuckups, which means companies are more safe today than ever before, at least on paper), and other issues matter, but you have other areas such as economics where it muddies the waters and a few dollars means more than bickering over a melting ice cap because the money is here and the ice is WAY over there.    But really the majority of Americans could give two shits about science. Confirmation bias is fun and people love that, no matter if the facts don't back it up (10% of the brain? They made a hit movie about that shit not so long ago that's raking in the dough. Or Gravity which blew the doors off of theaters and set records in sales, but is painfully unrealistic). Science fiction is huge, sure, but even "nerds" and "geeks" are rarely fans of actual science. I could list many more examples of that behavior, but long story short, even those who lean that direction honestly don't like science.    tl;dr Educated voters? How cute.
I tend to quote another line from the other guys:  "Special agent zipwire, these guys are pro's! (Aim for the bushes)".  Usually when I'm playing some multiplayer game with friends and we're losing.
If you're into LotR metal, you might also like Battlelore. Though they're a bit more "power metal" than perhaps you'd like.  Though I suppose that's to be expected, considering the subject matter.
Now Lillard, few years wall
i needed downforce, i also hate how it looks
i listed the player, can i pp u 2.50
Probably either Hawkeye, because, besides the obvious reasons, she's badass and still very down-to-earth, or Hohenheim, because he seems like an amazing guy to just sit down and talk to.
I recently went to an anime convention and maxed out my MH3U spotpasses while waiting in line. As I hopped into Tanzia, I heard a "...mreooooooowww...." in sort of a desperation tone. Turns out, if you max out your spotpasses, he gets pinned down by a massive backpack full of mail.
You wouldn't be ending things because of merely physical appearance, but because of sexual compatibility. Her attractiveness doesn't have much to do with it. Some totally super hot girls can suck in bed, some ordinary looking girls can be magic. 
Remember that western society in general has standards that do not hold up the logic you would hope they would.  It's the whole debate between violence and explosions and blood in media being fine, but sex being not okay. Just kerjigger it around a bit until you're on to abnormal sexualities as the point of argument.  Basically, the mothers would throw shitfits.
You would say that.
Try reading the article.
Ok, Hamas is a terrorist organization, jeopardizing the welfare of its "citizens" "followers" by hiding in their houses and there are plenty of arab states in the middle east, and the 1 jewish state there is being bullied. 
best sub ever
Oedipus being the first motherfucker
Omg. Sweeney Todd, and not the movie version. That story messed me up for a long time.  I went to a primary school for the performing arts, and at the end of each year, all of the arts programs got together to put on a school-wide production of Broadway's greatest hits. I'm in the 3rd grade orchestra. I'm 2nd Chair, only because my friend Brian took private lessons after school. I'm not bitter. Anyway, our teacher decided we weren't going to practice that day. We were having more of a recital meeting, which is when he told us the gruesome story of Sweeney Todd. I don't know how I got it in my mind that he was coming for me in my sleep, but I was convinced it was because I was vegetarian, and that would somehow make me a tastier hamburger.  I was't right for like, a year.
Dwarf Grumpy 
That's the first thing I saved on reddit. Thanks! No I gotta figure out how to find stuff I saved.
Dogs can smell really well and from a couple feet at least. The nose won't go anywhere near the K to snort it.
...Are you just regurgitating tags you've seen on tumblr? Seriously, none of those apply to this conversation at all.   When you make an assertion, it *is* your "job" to explain your position if you want to be taken seriously. 
I saw it in your history when I reviewed it when I was trying to figure out whether you were trolling us or just confused. I didn't downvote it, but chose to share the post in a private community of mods, as a subreddit like this concerns many moderators. Perhaps one of them downvoted you.  I subscribed, because I'd like to keep an eye on a subreddit like this. It could be problematic and start witch hunts if it grows.
I see that you, sir, cannot paint with all the colours of the wind 
Token: wOPqtlPzurbju2X1
Not all astrophysics is theoretical. In fact what I do is experimantal. But that's only if the multi billion dollar experimental machinery can actually prove that an incredibly tiny, never before detected wave even exists in the first place.
How did you feel starting out? Was it hard getting your name out there and playing shows close to home, or did you have to travel a lot?  What band(s) would you like to open for?  How do you feel about kijiji and other networks musicians use?
May I remind you that the Military has HUGE depots of stuff dating back to world war 2 that isn't even properly accounted for.
I would probably get doucer anyway, it's so pretty. Coincidentally, I just tried Nyx Terracotta since I happened to own it and it looks the same on my face! Funny how I never noticed before. 
It's more about the fact that normal people will not want to work in all of these sort of jobs. I would like to see a non-TFW move to a smaller, rural city and work at the gas station or the Tim's or at the fast food place. People complain about TFWs all they want, but their will be a problem when all these jobs are vacant 
A little outside of the normal submissions here, but I'm proud of it, and I love the way it turned out.   "Some part of our being knows this is where we came from. We long to return. And we can, because the cosmos is also within us. We're made of star-stuff. We are a way for the cosmos to know itself" -Carl Sagan  [instagram link](http://instagram.com/p/rInOsbvCZv/)  [imgur link](http://i.imgur.com/lHmf2FO.jpg)
A MURDER OF JACKDAWS!!!
Nuclear/Biological/Chemical
Aaaaannnddd $1 drafts.
ICBC, of course... 
Please do NOT take your cat to animal control. That is the last place on earth I would take my cat. Check rescue groups, humane societies. Make sure any group/shelter is a no kill shelter.
Male circumcision. It's sexual mutilation, usually done to children that have no say in it. To me it doesn't matter why it's done.   I know under rare circumstances it's needed (I was circumcised when I was 22) but doing it cause it looks good on that's just the status quo is wrong. Religious reasons... I honestly don't think it's a valid excuse. I'm sure some people that perform FGM think they're doing Gods work as well. 
Kanske, men om man googlar får man upp wikipedia först och då går det fort att bara byta språk på wikipedia.
So what I'm looking for are things on my need/want list. I want you to be able to breed them to be perfect 5IV spreads and keep them in their eggs. So something like your 4IV tynamo isn't something I'm interested in (I'm assuming it's already hatched etc etc).   With that said, if you're willing to breed perfect **eggs**, let me know and I'll give you the details on what I want so nothing is confused   
Lol surely fake
Eliminate these idiots before they reproduce. PLEASE GOVERNMENT
added :)
There's no doubt that the settlers are serious trouble &amp; in for no one's benefit but that of satisfying their own aims, but I'd rather have settlers dictating the actualities on the ground than you.  So, while it's not all well &amp; good, it's certainly better than anything you have to offer ;-)
Well I sort of doubt that Native American scholarship will. 
I've never been in a single accident in the 10 years that I've had a license. You can be smart and high at the same time. It doesn't turn you into some idiot that can't understand anything like tv and movie depict it.   I also wasn't stoned out of my mind. Just a buzz. 
Somebody please name their warship the USS HAL GILL please. 
Same face rigs.
I became interested once I started programming 2 years ago. The classes at school weren't enough so I self-taught C++11 and then tried to learn OpenGL 2, gave up, then came back to OpenGL 3.3/OpenGL 4, and of course I had to learn this stuff. I ended up just getting it after implementing my own types from scratch to make a quaternion-based camera. Now I'm making an actual game engine when I get time and using GLM instead of my own thing.  Also started the Game Dev Club at my high school, which consisted mostly of teaching freshmen AP Comp Sci and starting a simple game with graphics (in Java) using libGDX (so OpenGL, but wrapped up OpenGL).
*Skittles!*
Damn was hoping to get a game cs go in real quick.
very cute!
You and Scott Thunes both. Weird thing is, I like Stevie's Spanking, but after maybe the 20th listen the repetition really wears itself out.
ok give me a minute to go on
He's wearing mostly Havel's with Smelter Chest and Mad Warrior's mask. He's about as heavily armored as his opponent. Just without GMB or Sacred Oath. (which quite honestly does make a large difference)
It was a shrubbery!
YESSSS MORE MAPS IM NOT BUYING!
I actually like Unidan, but what about /r/unidansucks?
Yeah, I called it on another site when I watched the episode.  It was simple and literal enough to make sense for this show.
My patriarchal oracle tells me I should seek out my calling and election in this life. So I was curious about that since I got it at a too young age. Never thought of it as a deal breaker but after reading your story I totally get it.
Who knows. There were 8 I think when I did it. I only did one.
He wants that bigger contract, another great postseason equals $$$$$$$
I already have. The top comment is talking about Ronin and it took me until your comment to realize they weren't talking about MC Hammer from Guardians.
It's popping up on CSI and Amazon now and then this past week. Might even be able to find it at Target at some point soon, just keep your eyes peeled.
You must have done it often, i usually just get a few minutes
mom paying for birthday drinks does not count OP
Immediately apply for unemployment.  It takes awhile to kick in, so the sooner you do it, the better.  I did it the second I got home after being fired.  Polish up your resume.  Maybe it's been awhile since you last updated it, so make it relevant, spell-check and tailor it to your new needs.  And look for jobs.  Indeed has great searches, as does Monster, Craigslist, and others.  Also check government websites for state or country jobs, education websites, etc.  Most places nowadays are hiring for Back to School and the holidays, so you'll have a great chance picking up some kind of position in retail. 
Favorite game on the GBA as a kid. Still holds up to this day. Get the sequel too when you get the chance. Quality RPGs, with awesome puzzle elements.
I can confirm this. I run 3x1440p monitors and 1 1080p monitor. When I add the Rift and have 5 monitors, or 4 if I'm mirroring the Rift with the 1080p display, I get stuttering whenever I move my head. If I disable my 1440p monitors and just have the 1080p and Rift connected, all is good.
God damn it people! The casings are stuck because a fucking horde of living dead trampled them in there! There, I fucking explained it. Now tell me why it says don't open dead inside. No one can fit in that console. It's pointless. 
This good to know because I make sushi frequently and always worry about parasites.
When this was first released i contacted these guys and had a look at the video they seem legit . Its a great innovation.
Well there problems with the mandatory arrest policy in the UK, that's for sure.
Australia, NZ, Canada, UK, all have a NFC system called Paypass/Paywave, it's quite widespread in Australia now.  All MC/Visa cards now support it, and most retailers do too, with huge increases in the past year or so.  http://www.reddit.com/r/TalesFromRetail/comments/2c8p4u/today_australian_retail_workers_are_in_for_a/cjdc2ur  In Australia, so far there aren't many phones can use NFC with the Paypass/Paywave system directly, although Commonwealth Bank has some trials going on with certain Samsung models.  The problem is that banks want to be very strict about any hardware that has the potential to interact with their equipment (the NFC readers at the merchants).   I do like the idea since potentially the phone could turn off the NFC element if not unlocked (or similar), making it more secure than a 'dumb' card that has no user interaction.
But eso requires gold.
*she runs her hands down your back, stopping at the hem of your shirt and running her hands under your shirt, touching you back lightly*
Loljk it's g-eazy and ur mum. Better?
I think it might also be because the songs they performed are older ones that they have experience doing live back in NYC. Also, there was a limited window they had to perform, so they could only do so many songs in that time. Really makes me hope for a full-fledged tour (or a longer one-off) someday.
Interesting.
your opinion but i think ~~tencent~~ hi-rez butchered nu wa with no mercy
Mine is a jumper too but not up to a counter top extreme! Nothing above hip height really.
If Caleb won, the Detonators would be sitting pretty. Frankie is Caleb's best friend, and he and Derrick are excellent at manipulating him. Caleb is also completely loyal to the Bomb Squad and would likely target Victoria, Nicole or Donny.
That's why I'm a minimalist. Once I got rid of most of my material possessions, the few that remain don't take much to keep clean and tidy. It's also why I keep my hair short and wear long dresses. It's frumpy as hell but I just don't have the time. Because if you think a man's existence requires a maintenance, you should try being a woman and keeping up with all that shaving and waxing and painting and polishing and spraying and curling...
yeah. I've been on the phone calling everyone and figuring it out, and he's sobbing in bed. He won't get out. I told him he needs to get over it, it's done, new plan, and he told me to fuck off. I lost my temper and told him he is unreliable, but he lost it and went on and on about how this proves him to be reliable. I get that he also just lost a job, but I know not to call in sick the first week of work, and I know to double triple quadruple check that I have it off and the schedule has me off. I would have asked if they had a posted schedule for those dates. I would have talked about the trip endlessly to make sure they knew about it for SURE. 
I have a tuft and needle with the LEIRVIK frame.  I really like the combo.  Making the bed is kind of a pain because it fits pretty snug, but the upside is that my sheets stay on really well. Something to remember with ikea slats, the cheaper flat ones are recommended for foundations or for people who like their beds a little firmer.  The slightly more expensive curved slats are great for mattresses without the foundation because they add a little extra spring the the mattress.  At least that's what the ikea employee told me.  Overall really happy with it.
Go to operation sports, then go to forums, then go to the madden forum, finally find the custom covers thread.  It's full of hundreds of custom made professional looking covers. They also take requests. Also they show you how to make your own :)
&gt; Not everyone should be able to sustain the highest map level.  Every time I hear this I have to ask: why?  It seems even GGG doesn't completely agree, otherwise they would never have added a way to do so.  It's not fun having to start over from low level maps, and why anyone would want to do that I cant even fathom. Unless of course they play for 12 hours a day and need an artificial system to keep them playing I guess... It's really just RNG gated progression though, which seems terrible to me.  Your ability to progress should never be limited solely RNG... 
They'd say something by Brand New 
It means there is a human somewhere involved in this.   Either they are congratulating you on the find or they are saying "Eh, what the hell, now that it's out, might as well get some free donations."
Interesting My issue was that it wouldn't open unless I had my phone on Japan time, probably has something to do with me spam updating on PST when it wouldn't update though lol
There's a shop here that has fake Cohibas just like that one. There are a few different ones, actually, with vastly different, obviously fake bands. Who would counterfeit a Dominican Cohiba?
Are not familiar with how negotiation works?  Neither side realistically expects to get what they were first asking for. Marshawn wanted a lot more money. Seattle didn't want to give him any more money. The compromise to where Marshawn gets a little more money. Both sides benefit 
That's what you think.
You're cool, you're cool, fuck you, you're cool.
I think the little guy's on a treadmill.
Wow. Those are amazing. 
you sir are one lucky bastard
Force refund usually means you ask Paypal/whatever to retract your payment due to incomplete delivery etc which is viable according to Paypals ToS, but the sellers like PGI in this case usually react to those things quite aggressively.
Wait, how do the snowball items stack like that?
there go all your shortcuts
I realized that as humans we are not perfect. Everyone has flaws, mine are in my looks. So I decided to build up the things that matter, the things I wanted to be known by. I wanted to be known by how I treated people, my attitude, and personality. There are some people who turn their heads at people who aren't "pretty." And honestly, you dont need people like that in your life anyway. Do I think your pretty? Yes i do. Will he? I cant say. If he doesnt like you based on your looks you dont need him anyway. 
And? Some of the top rated players on OCE were Diamond 1 70+ LP back on NA with more than 180 ping, which is better than most players on NA who play with less than 50 ping. Not sure why this is even a circlejerk. Probably just an excuse to be bad; least to say.
__^[wow ^so ^verify]__: ^/u/Doomhammer458 ^-&gt; ^/u/dogegiftbot __^Ð5000 ^Dogecoins__&amp;nbsp;^__($1.0548)__ ^[[help]](http://www.reddit.com/r/dogetipbot/wiki/index)
Considering damn near every single comment has about -400 karma. I think the compensation is working.
YOU CAN IF YOU'RE PLAYING OAKLAND
At least he didn't want to eat her pussy, that could have cause problems. 
Cute cute cute!! Your application looks fresh and natural. If you're into it at all, consider some orange base reds for lip color. It would look lovely with your skin tone. I'm NC 44 in MAC, and I personally love Becca lip tint in Papaya. 
Why don't we do postgame first?...
We love you Jim! Thanks for always keeping Bob in check whenever he starts talking like a unbelievably biased homer announcer.
So very bad. SMH
They did jump, but they didn't kill themselves. They were forced to die, so it was not suicide. I don't know why this is such a difficult concept for you to grasp.
done :)
I would only walk 500 miles.  On second thought, I would walk 500 more.
Chase has me around 6.5% I think. My federal loans are worse around 8 or 9.
I agree. Commander just does not seem worth it.
It is hard to compete against a chest tattoo.
Apple surprisingly doesn't have the same restriction. 
The PGA covers its ass better than any of the major sports because players can WD at any time for any reason. They just let the players say "family issues" or such and come back 3 months later after everyone has forgotten.
To get a good sense of who "created" the Ripple technology, one needs to look no further than Github contributions: https://github.com/stellar/stellard/graphs/contributors
FYI: If you go by yourself to Olive Garden, they still bring out the big bowl with the salad. By the time my entree got there, I was like...."Yeah I'm gonna need a box."  Ninja edit: reading this I am not sure what is more sad. The fact that I sat alone at Olive Garden, or the fact that I chose Olive Garden over /u/Honestly_'s options in my own city. I need friends.
Drafted like a beast last year thanks to them.  A+ from me.  They will not help obviously if your 1st or 2nd rounder go down due to injury, or your player just shits the bed or whatever. They are great for getting the consensus ranking of players, without having to read 20 websites.  That's what I want, and so they're perfect for me. :)
It's HowToBasic. Pretty funny but gets old fast. 
Searched through the comments to find Rorschach, was not disappointed except at how far down it is.
[Relevant](http://lh4.googleusercontent.com/-4ZyrqpFfC_c/TjPeiPSIzDI/AAAAAAAAAOY/k_5AeIsU-Rk/s0/1264494557Funny-Animation-Pictures-3.gif)?
I find that having too many fetishes tend to result in more crowding, so I tend to go with fetish army over fetish sycophants to reduce this and avoid having more than 1 pet doctor in a party. Under these conditions I don't tend to have too many issues with the gargantuan not attacking.  Also, you can also do things like spirit walk into the most densely packed clump of mobs before summoning the wrathful protector there to get the right positioning.
And where did I say that? 
My id number is 55929
That was before melee became super popular as a competitive game. 
That's exactly what I think. And besides that, it is an endangered especies after all, we shouldn't kill it for acting like a normal tiger. 
Thanks for the advice. Have an upvote.
WTF you guys are morons. This isn't advice.
I agree. Shorter is better.
A man of his word series by Duncan is 10 books split into 2 story arcs of 5 books. Great series with a non-conventional magic system.  Basically, you gather certain magic words. The more you own, and the rarer the words are, the more powerful you become. Just don't gather too many...
Anything on r/funny
When I say "sexes", I mean male and female (not that there isn't any others). Male and female are not reproductively equal.  I'm done, because you obviously can't seem to get that, among with how history plays a part here.
[Here's what a read yesterday.](http://motherboard.vice.com/read/bitcoin-could-change-voting-the-way-its-changed-money)
"His hair was perfect."  Such an under appreciated piece of lyrical wit.
Years ago I interviewed for a tech job at a janitorial service in Evanston. I asked if the owner was orthodox, since there was a mezuzah in every office room doorway. Was told a fired employee had returned to the office and shot several executives, killing them, thus the mezuzahs. I was called back for a second interview but declined bec the place creeped me out. 
If I had to choose between poop in my pants or poop in my toilet. I choose toilet.
Nnnooot really... no... why exactly would I make it look boring?
Needs more men
One biased source after another.  You should look into what insurance is and how premium and risk is calculated.
I know no Cabernet Sauvignon or Malbec, my two favorites :( 
Either will do.  If they provide that speed properly 6mbps will be enough for HD Youtube and Netflix (just), 20mbps will feel better if you download large files often (torrenting movies where you can't watch as it downloads, downloading steam games, etc). 
It's not that your argument is "difficult", the problem is just that I've shown it to be wrong. 
A random boner occurs with no stimulation or arousal at all. That is not a random boner.
she will be thrilled with all the medical procedures and bills she cant object to
I woke up angry after a fight with my GF. A shitty month at work and a bit of financial trouble. How is this positive?   I still have it better than 95% of the worlds population, a family that loves me and cold beer in the fridge.   What more can a man ask for?
Here's the thing. He says it's a waste of time and everyone is a shitter autist when they cheese him but as I pointed out in chat earlier, Destiny's strongest game is his late game and sometimes even mid-game attacks when he feels like it. So if I was matched up against him and knowing that I can't beat him in a late game. I'm most likely going to cheese or at the least a 2 base all-in.  Obviously people that can beat him in a macro game won't mind playing one since they know that are better than him (koreans and otherwise)  So I find it very deconstructive instead of working on defending these autistic cheese builds he just calls them worthless and wastes of time.  IMO this is THE main thing holding him back in tournament settings. It's common knowledge you have a better chance to win by cheesing or a well planned all-in than going to the later game. If battle.net had the kind of stats that GSL has, you would see Destiny win% in a game longer than 18 mins is probably over 60%. Literally only need to get to the late game safely and he would win so much more. That's my opinion
It is Teal :) missing the battery cover but works flawless and in great condition :)
Code Red, the cherry flavor with coke is nice. 
Not at all.
I was. Home now. 
OW SHIT SORRY  Jeez!
Well, if Jerma's goal was to get more people playing Hydro, then mission fucking accomplished... because I got a hankerin' for some old-timey TC goodness.
"What's your Reddit username?"
Whether or not I believe I have a father, I am part of his family. He is revealed to me in my maturity, but I was always his. So it is with God. I had marvelous, rationale logic upon which I built my disbelief. Like others, I saw terrible pain and tragedy and wished there would be no God simply so as not to force me to confront the reality of an unloving father God. I knew enough of science to say that I couldn't rely on the material world to reveal the mysteries that seem to exist beyond what we hope we know to be true and real and knowable. Yet, I belonged to God in my disbelief and was patient. When I seek God, I am still. Arguments soothed me once. Now, stillness and patience are my more reliable companions. 
Where are you? 
Why would they assume anything about the author?  Plenty of authors are women and/or not white and/or whatever.  Did you know one of the head writers for the Guardians of the Galaxy movie was a woman?  I didn't,and the fact that learning it surprised me reflects my own biases... but now I know.  Women do, in fact, write things.
She can still tower push well if she got poly and shard which are pretty cheap but she can't stealth everywhere anymore and be a burden to every person in the game.
Not invincible, only immortal, and him taking over a few monsters would be, interesting to say the least.
Lol. 
I have 3 big tattoos, but didn't have any issues with any of them.
dead people.
Canada is a country I would really like to live in one day. I've seen photos of that country and it looks really nice. 
I have an Adamant No Guard Pentaperfect with Bullet Punch, Thunder Punch, Ice Punch, and Knock Off. I'd like that Xerneas you mentioned in your other comment.
De nada ;) 
really great idea, but i don't think having fields of human cutouts would fit so well into the game.  rather, maybe some sort of structure to hold the torch up, like a tiki torch, could be used around the house to illuminate, but ALSO used cleverly inside forests or whatnot as a decoy.
Interesting. Thanks for this... I'm 30 minutes away from finishing up my download of Archeage. I'm looking forward to trying BDO, though. Too bad it seems far off.
Have you tried updating your motherboard BIOS?
When the half burnt bodies were laying all around me, and I sat there, just pondering my life decisions.
I dunno. I think the face of the golden eagle make it look like that dumb albatross on the badge.
Added :D
I would have gone if I was Cano, oh well great inning. Ack attack and I like the new guy even more!
and this is why viewing the thumbnail only before commenting is a bad plan.
Wow this was so much more confusing for me initially, I thought he was talking about the actual birds, ospreys. Oh dear!
The precedent they were worried about was signing him to a new contract after just signing him to the one he's on now. The fines aren't really the kind of message they want to send.
In my particular case it was a combination of her shitty exes, her previously hoodrat lifestyle, and her wasted psychology degree.  I also mentioned at one point that I get really angry sometimes. Turns out to be a pretty normal thing for most people. Especially when they have a demanding entitled girlfriend.
&amp;gt;What is the justification for Israel's being a "Jewish" state? Is merely that "the Jews have historically been treated poorly, so they deserve it"?  As long as there are divisions of society then nations will exist as representations of language/culture/religion etc. Unfortunately, should one divest oneself of any particular affiliation, that does not imply that all others do so too. Consequently, as long as the security situation requires it, there exists a need for a large state to enforce even secular, non-nationalistic, pacifistic or anarchistic presence.  Conceivably, one could live without any contrivance of ideology, but the problem of others requires force to maintain such an atmosphere.  It's somewhat ironic but not insane.
http://www.theonion.com/articles/experts-ebola-vaccine-at-least-50-white-people-awa,36580/
You also have to factor in the maturity of India as a nation, the factions within the nation and the fact that they are attempting to govern a billion people. A lot of the populace has their own social and moral codes based on region and heritage. So it's not really fair to judge India by our standards.
Boobs
You could leave the mods installed for when you're done with New Vegas, but then the mod authors will come out with new versions of their mods, and you can't just update, because that could further destabilize the game, no, you'll have to delete everything, including the base game, and start all over.
[Oh boy here we go](http://www.salon.com/2014/07/28/dont_believe_that_new_cheerios_commercial_why_i_hate_the_myth_of_the_cool_dad/?wpsrc=huffpo)
# presidentialprivileges 
I would recommend Sherwin Williams Harmony with an egg shell finish for the drywall and semi gloss for the woodwork. Painters tape is misnamed. Painters do not need tape and neither do you.   Do not start out with your brush right on the line you are painting. Start down the wall, pull your bristles out and move into the cut in line. Keep a clean, damp rag handy and keep your edges clean by wrapping the rag around your 5 in 1 tool and sharpen your cut in with it. Also use the right sized brush for the area you are painting.   If you are doing two coats (and by asking if you are I am implying you should) roll the first coat out and then do the cut in. Cheat with your cut in away from your line just a little. For the second coat cut one wall in and straighten your lines then roll the wall out and move on.
[He's right harmless...](http://i.imgur.com/KgVTmxg.png)
great discussion, ty
RICK AND MORTY, do a Rick and Morty picture! 
Awesome to see Tadic get on the score-sheet. How was he in the game?  I think that you lot are still solid in the middle of the park with Wanyama, JWP, and Schneiderlin if he stays. Cant wait to see who else you sign.
The oft recited "This game is still in beta" has practically disappeared. For good reason. Much more fleshed out and fun than it used to be.
I won't buy it cuz I already convinced my sister to buy it for my birthday ;D, and the reason it's because so far it looks amazing the combos the player execute look k amazing like Zelda performing the ballad of the games. Also the video of Darunia vs Dodongo just makes it look so much like monster Hunter meets Tloz. 
Nitpick because I'm an asshole: those aren't Hocotatians, the dudes from pikmin 3 are [Koppaites](http://pikmin.wikia.com/wiki/Koppai), though E. Gadd looks similar to both them and Olimar (who is a Hocotatian).
Florida has its issues, but I'll take a walk in downtown Orlando at midnight any day vs Santurce. 
http://www.reddit.com/r/bloomington/comments/2c9us3/whole_foods_market_coming_to_bloomington_whole/
I dont think his comment karma is updated correctly because nearly every post of his is negative
**"Bitch got hot." [+133]**  ---  At 2014-07-31 21:12:18 UTC, [/u/Hrel](/u/Hrel) replied to ["Then and now"](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/2c9rmn) [+141 points: +141, -0]:  &gt; Bitch got hot.   [Screenshot](http://i.imgur.com/apS1JLg.png)  [Vote History on srscharts](http://74.207.230.31/srscharts/#cjddodm)  &amp;nbsp;^This&amp;nbsp;comment&amp;nbsp;posted&amp;nbsp;by&amp;nbsp;a&amp;nbsp;bot&amp;nbsp;|&amp;nbsp;[Report&amp;nbsp;an&amp;nbsp;error](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SRScreenshot&amp;subject=Bug%20report&amp;message=%5BComment%20thread%5D%28http%3A//www.reddit.com/r/ShitRedditSays/comments/2cafg1/bitch_got_hot_133/%29%0A%0APlease%20add%20any%20additional%20comments%20below.%0A%0A)&amp;nbsp;|&amp;nbsp;[FAQ](/r/SRScreenshot/wiki/faq)
What?
Thanks
I kind of get it. I'm bisexual but homoromantic. I've never dated a man, nor do I want to, though I want to experiment with sleeping with one once because I do find them physically attractive and I'm curious about the experience. Aside from that slight attraction and curiosity, I'm probably more like the average lesbian than the average bisexual who HAS dated/slept with men and would continue to do so. That said, I don't think it's entirely out of the realm of possibility for me to fall in love with a guy. Very, very slim chance but still technically possible.   Do you let one exception to the rule completely negate how you identify?  
I'm sad that the pokeball vivillon is Europe again. Germany to be specific.
I guess [@Nullable](http://stackoverflow.com/questions/14076296/nullable-annotation-usage) could help as well.
I'd record them whenever they got together, over my Luther Vandross mixtape, and I would play it on the go, much better than radio.
Of course this is a very personal decision, so I can only speak to what I think I'd feel if I were in your position.   Can you afford to live on the private school salary for 1-2 years? Will you be able to pay your loans and rent, etc? If so, I think it sounds like a good opportunity. Besides the pay, you sound excited talking about it - and it's a real teaching job, in your field, which is nothing to laugh at! Since it does start earlier than your local public schools, I think if you get close to the beginning of the year for the private school, it would be easiest for you to just commit to the job for the year (less stress in wondering where you'll be, worrying about interviews/applications, etc. in addition to planning for the new year!).   You have the rest of forever to get back into public schools and the experience of teaching multiple levels in your field will be very valuable.  Good luck with your decision! 
KBD or mole are probably your only options..  Maybe get 75 magic and solo rex?  That's really boring though.  Work on stats, 90+ all and buy 70 prayer.
That's adorable, as in the clingy part.
Sometimes I like to imagine that Dre is ghost producing/writing for another group that he uses as a front and will eventually reveal that he's actually Death Grips or something crazy.
Also I haven't felt any contractions that I would consider contractions. I didn't even think I was having BH. But apparently I have been and they are doing something. I am afraid I am gonna be in labor and not even know it and the baby is just pop out randomly. 
Thanks for the secret, I'll take it to heart.
I haven't done the math, but I imagine the 1080p on my 4.7" HTC One is similar in density to the 1440p 5.7" Note 4. So I don't think the pixel density will be outrageous.
That's pretty much my issue as well
~~Dick pics~~  Nah, I'm good.
I think the problem here is that you think those are simple things to accomplish. In reality they take far more talent than you can get by reading some books. You are asking how to go from step A to step Z, without realizing that there are really about ten thousand steps in between.  If you want to become an entrepreneur, start small. Begin with a small business that you can run from home after work or on the weekends. Learn how to do the books, run advertising, manage customers, etc. Then  you can start thinking about your big idea and how to get from A to Z.
So you were smart enough to spell it correctly in the url. But when it came to the Reddit post, you were like *nah, let's go the other way.*
Just a heads up, if you had added two 1 rank masks to the empty sub spots, you could've dropped your average rarity, which would've upped your score even more (not that you needed it).
Suarez isn't French however
I think long hair is not your thing. Get hairlength in betwen the short and medium of your pictures. Also you loo way better without the glasses.  this hair length is best I think: http://menhairstylesideaz.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/02/hot-new-hairstyles-for-medium-length-hair.jpg
We are probably more Libertarian, douches like Bill O'reilly want the govt to stay out of our lives but only if you are rich, if your middle to lower class then he wants you in prison for smoking weed. Asshole
I agree that I'm getting phenomenal odds. However, I think if I analyzed my range from villain's perspective (sum lvl 2 shit goin on hurr), I hardly ever have any non-pairs in my range. So, given that he donk-shoved river when my hand seems to also contain a full house, I'm forced to readjust my river calling range to possibly exclude out TT.  That's way beyond the scope of what I was doing at the time though, and I think it's only ever slightly -EV for me to call river, especially considering that this is micro and villain could just be spazzing out, but that's just something interesting that I've gained from this discussion.  Thanks for your input!
Thanks for remembering us! :D
It's the same here in CO. So damn nice. Just got a $105 1/2 oz of Blue Dream a couple hours ago haha
Ok that is different.   Your situation still I do not think it will end well. Going against your parents wishes, although may valid according the madhhab you follow, may cause huge problems down the line.   What happens when you have children? If your parents don't accept him they may not accept your children or will accept them but still be standoffish towards your husband whereby putting your children in the middle of respecting their father and respecting their grand parents.  Either way your choices are limited will have take extreme action. Either marry this man and just deal with the fact your parents will forever not accept the situation or not marry him and deal the anger and resentment towards your parents.  If you have someone who your parents respects speak on this guy behalf then maybe they will agree. Otherwise, this situation it's not going to end well.
&gt; monarchy loyalist gatherings for Gaza who also raise Da3sh flags  &gt;   Wait what? Isn't a monarchy under Islam forbidden?
Coatrack maybe
Oh, gee, that's so upsetting. I hope she's ok- Oh, wait. NONE OF THAT HAPPENED.  Why do FAers think everyone is willing to risk their job just to shame them for being fat?
*she looks behind her* They have a type?
How in the Nine are these guys still in business?!
Welcome, fellow greymuzzle. I live about as far from you as can be in the contiguous 48. It's cool that your wife is down.
Yeah sorry I could have been more clear. Even if you have a capture card you should still check out sharefactory, it is really good. 
Mesmo com portes pagos, Amazon. Pesquisa nas lojas que vendem através da Amazon, não compres os jogos fornecidos mesmo pela loja Amazon, às vezes encontras portes muito mais baratos. 
"No, he's good he likes his sun lamp and his bugs given to him."
While Leo has done some amazing work, I have a hard time thinking he deserved an Oscar when I think of some of the competition he had in the years he was nominated.  [For example - 2014.](http://www.imdb.com/event/ev0000003/2014?ref_=nmawd_awd_1)  [For example - 2007.](http://www.imdb.com/event/ev0000003/2007?ref_=nmawd_awd_2)  [For example - 2005.](http://www.imdb.com/event/ev0000003/2005?ref_=nmawd_awd_3)  [For example - 1994.](http://www.imdb.com/event/ev0000003/1994?ref_=nmawd_awd_4)
Is the update for x- box 360
August Burns Red - Echoes
Why do you want him over Charles/shady? 
Is that your mom in the passenger seat? 
good luck mate
Sonics already in. 
Sure thing!
Too long, too slow editing wise, not loud enough
No /r/wtf
As far as I know, Feather Falling wasn't nerfed. However, I don't know if it was always like this, but it is random. You can fall the same amount, and die, or take 1 heart of damage. It's wildly inconsistent. I hope it isn't intentional.
SMB/Duckhunt, SMB 3, Zelda, StarTropics, Double Dragon 2, Commander Keen Series, Doom, Wolfenstien, NHL 95, and lots of point and click adventure games, as well as games like Police Quest.  EDIT: Warcraft and Warcraft 2: Tides of Darkness.  Me and a buddy would play over LAN all the time before battle.net
550
Do your dog a favor and just get front line.   That shit kills ticks and fleas like a champ.
First you make up an "I" and then you invent "exists" and then you invent that "I" that is all that exists...  Sounds like lots of pretending and nobody making the tea.
That's no good either.   What happens if this one person with access to the server has an accident? How do you have any monitoring of the one person with access to this server?  There should be a minimum of two people involved.
i guess you'd rather only grind to 10 with 1/20 of the of the current chance to upgrade - because 10 is less than 200 am i right ?!
You routed the SATA cables the wrong direction. Unless you are into that kind of thing.
@MotherTeresa Spread love everywhere you go. Let no one ever come to you without leaving happier \#nohomo
I think you hit the proverbial nail exactly on the head. Thank you!
I dropped mine in some melted chocolate. No word of a lie, fully submerged in gloopy chocolate - still alive!
What is the BO you looked up in the first game of the 1 Base Blink all in?
Every single red flag has been thrown, OP. My abusive relationship started out this way to a T. Please leave. He has a well crafted Nice persona, but that character is not who he is at core.  What will happen if you stay and real life stresses crop up? What if you get sick, or hurt, and have to depend on him to take up your slack temporarily? Can you even imagine it?
Phone lines cannot melt regardless of traffic on them.
Which made Torts powerless 
[I need to go to my quiet place](http://2.bp.blogspot.com/-mi8vXWWc4uk/UBGk7D05dtI/AAAAAAAAAeU/CEkyeUjWaOY/s1600/hot+rod+2.gif)
Its on Main ST. I live in West Haven my self, and was trying to pin point whereabouts it is. I can ask around if anyone is looking for a place, I know a few friends of mine where looking not to long ago so maybe they can help take it off your hands. 
so I'm working as a volunteer in the Galapagos right now, been here 2 and a half months already, this random lizard came into my room on the first day and just decided to stay. Don't defend it, but every time a fly comes into my room i chase it towards him and he eats it. I think we have a mutually beneficial relationship, oh and I named him Greg
This is sweet! I can incorporate it into the video. Thanks!  Weird thing is the first time I clicked I got.. Clayfighter 2: Judgement Day.  This is my first video...  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zX25LZJ83qw
http://imgur.com/fb37sv7  Looks nice in temperate too, but when you add a Dutch grf...
Well shit...
Did you know that ducks have three eyelids?
:)
Hi! So sorry to hear about this diagnosis....we are going through our own pet crisis right now, otherwise I would pitch in!  But I hope I can help by letting you know about [The Big Hearts Fund](http://www.bigheartsfund.org/). They raise money to help with treatment for just this sort of thing! We lost our cat, Kenobi, to heart disease a few months ago, and I wish I had known about The Big Hearts Fund before he passed. But they let me share my story about our baby and that helped a whole lot, too.  I know your Lexi will get the help she needs! Hug her everyday, and keep us updated!
Micro yes...no curves on sides. However I do live in MN so i dont think its to likely that liquor stores know everything about Maine? Never seen a fake maine here.
Yes, but the Durant cheese takes too long and I wanted to win more "legitimately" (although mega Kanga is practically uber, haha).
Of course.... Why... would it not be! Ah, fuck Kitty, meow for me...
If your considering one, it's for you.  Id never even consider because I hate the look. It's a personal thing, but they play and sound amazing and are built like tanks.
I got a thing at Fry's that you plug into your car's a/c port and has a USB input on it. I just use that and the charger that came with my phone. It was 99 cents 
Not that you asked, but of the few things I feel comfortable offering (candid) advice on is career paths an accounting major can take, so I'd be happy to give any advice I can. I love this topic enough that once a year, I go back to my alma mater for a couple days and give a presentation to all the undergraduate students taking Financial Accounting.   You've made a very good choice. The career options you will have once you obtain a CPA are endless. Whether you choose to go the Staff Accountant &gt; Controller route, Public Accounting &gt; Internal Audit, etc., being able to understand how a business makes money is a skill that will never be undervalued.   Accounting/Finance Double Major (CPA + CFA), worked for Big 4 (audit and then transaction services). Now do multinational finance consulting. I love this topic enough that once a year, I go back to my alma mater for a couple days and give a presentation to all the undergraduate students taking Financial Accounting. 
I guess it comes down to how much you care about money.  If you don't care, then yeah, sure, get your peace of mind and have it towed to a shop and get it looked at.  It will depend a lot on the shop you go to.  I'd bet that many shops will just put some fresh gas in it and have a new guy drive it for 20 miles and see what's wrong with it then give it back to you and charge you (this really isn't really that bad or dishonest, it's just that it's a lot more efficient to solve obvious problems than to look carefully for future problems and will depend a lot on the shop's style).  Other shops might preemptively blow out the lines, change the filter, and do a bunch of other stuff, etc...   If you're a little adventurous, you can do most of the stuff yourself.  If the tank is not very full, then a full tank of new gas will probably dilute most of what's in there and it will run well enough to let you know if anything has really dried up between the tank and the injectors, or other valve cover gaskets etc.  If the tank is full and you know what to do with your old gas (check local environmental regulations), you can pump it out with a cheap fluid transfer pump, and replace it with fresh gas--I'd bet you'd be fine doing this.  I would predict that it will crank for a while before it fires up.  Just check the oil (and coolant) before you do this to make sure some weird thing didn't drain it all out of there.   Then take it to a shop and get all the other fluids changed--don't forget to change your brake fluid which has probably absorbed some water.  Look very very carefully at the tires (head over to /r/justrolledintotheshop to learn more about old tires gone bad), I'd just replace them if you can afford it, some people would probably disagree.  Overall I'd say it's probably fine, most cars like to run;  a car that has sat for a long time will probably lose some life over the long run but you'll be fine.  It's much worse with old cars and old carburetors and cork gaskets that dry up, crack and leak.  I bet your car will be fine.  Just throw a battery in it and drive it.   (I'm also more than happy to be corrected by more experienced mechanics)
Which works great for the narrative. But SR combat is not something you can Fast Forward through =)
Yogurt?
Oh shit nigga
1.Timberwolves, M.Jordan  2.Wizards, K.Abdul-Jabbar  3.Warriors, E.Johnson  4.Grizzlies, L. Bird  5.Nets, W.Chamberlain  6.Cavaliers, H.Olajuwon  7.Kings, T.Duncan  8.Heat, S.O'Neal  9.Hawks, B. Russell  10.Spurs, L.James  11.Celtics, O.Robertson  12.Bucks, K.Bryant  13.Rockets, D.Robinson  14.Lakers, M.Malone  15.Trailblazers, B.Walton  16.Pistons, C.Barkley  17.Nuggets, W.Unseld  18.Magic, J.West  19.Hornets, K.Malone  20.Bulls, E.Baylor  21.Knicks, S.Pippen  22.Pacers, J.Stockton  23.Suns, I.Thomas  24.Sixers, W.Reed  25.Pelicans, J.Erving  26.Thunder, P.Ewing  27.Raptors, C.Drexler  28.Mavericks, W.Frazier  29.Clippers, E.Hayes  30.Jazz, J.Havlicek
This is a fairly good summation of where I am at as a politically disinterested atheist:  http://www.tabletmag.com/scroll/180808/sam-harris-why-dont-i-criticize-israel
I LAUGHED with the "Wonderwall" Single CD thing hahah I never understood why people don't like that song.   And that "script" is wonderful. Maybe someday, somebody will make it true (as a single episode tho)
&gt;Admins really need to have access to some logs, especially who killed who.  This has potential for unintended abuse. What if a person kills you(the admin) and you assume they were cheating but it just turns out that you were experiencing a great deal of desync?
I was talking about the GPU in that build, a GT610. I got one for my streaming PC because it was the cheapest passive cooling GPU with decent performance.  I had to get it because the AMD has no onboard video. It was the 8320 on the M5A99X and was at 4.5GHz at 1.41V and cooled by H100i.
I suppose it would depend on their entry point. Going through Syria they would get slaughtered , if they somehow went through the West Bank then they probably behave more like Hamas.
False information.
Do you really want to know why it's news? it's stated in the article &gt;The study, led by Trinity College sociologist Antje Roder, was conducted in order to gauge the impact of the mass influx of migrants over the past decade on Irish society in years to come.  Considering the reaction to mass immigration in Britain, it is very much news.  Or you just showing how much you approve of immigration by dismissing it as non-news so someone who disagrees will be drawn into a heated debate over it?
You know Pepsi is better. Just admit it. 
I don't know. You seem to be equivocatin DRM with copy protection. MS basically wanted to change what it means to own a game. Now we can go on and on about having never actually owned games, but when you have all the privelidges of ownership that comes with any other copyright material, it *is* ownership. MS tried to change that, but people collectively told MS to go fuck themselves.  People with poor internet can't have digital games now. Though people without internet can, where they couldn't have any before.
oh no not this thread  everything i say 
Secret Tunnel!
Do they really think people are stupid enough to believe such bullshit? I guess we'll soon see flyers with Tom Mulcair eating babies then! 
I just ordered one on best buy two days ago... Will be here tomorrow
looking for around 280
Yes.
Agreed. As well as improving his pick n roll D. Hopefully Collison and Cousins can form some good chemistry in that department. I don't want to blame IT for Boogie's poor defense, but that combo was terrible in PnR D because IT just plain gave up when he ran into the screen. Hopefully Collison fights through and is able to help more. 
The only times you need to do structural threads if you are going to grow/print the part or want your render to look realistic.
At one point it was also a consensus that the earth was flat.  Then humans gained more understanding. 
Mostly off-topic, but the same thing actually happened in Alberta with the FR125, actually--it sat collecting dust in a warehouse for months (and didn't get released until a month after it showed up in Ontario). So it must have been a mistake on Four Roses' part that got caught by two different provincial liquor boards.  Any word on what the mistake was, specifically?
Eh, it's still a long lunch break out of the office
right written and drawn. will upload tomorrow.
Well i use mobile reddit most if the time. But my FC is 0834-0767-9413
Close, but less strings.
ugh... gay. 
hhaha
i'm on now. =)
I've tried but they end up liking me and it gets awkward or they don't like the "hobbies" I'm into...I'm not "gay" enough as they have told me. Fortunately though the hubby smokes as much as I do so when we get home from the office its on! haha! 
Now I just have to wait for someone to translate the pc version for us english speaking casuals...  Go on internet, I'll wait:)^please.
Laptop screens/trackpad/cleaning (dust &amp; software).  Computer upgrades (hard drive, ram, and more).  Gaming computer building - I can work with all budgets. 
There's also a site called something like pornfetishbutton.com or something like that, can't look it up cos I'm at work. Click the big red button and takes you to random fetishes. From tame to EXTREME
It was a decision that made good sense at the time. When my agent first did the deal with Night Shade (my US publisher), we had a few UK publishers interested, so she thought I had a decent chance of selling UK/Aus rights to them.  Plus, my agent had already heard some ominous things about Night Shade, so selling only North American rights was a way of hedging our bets.  She thought if things went bad with NS, retaining some English-language rights would ensure I still had other options.  (This was a very good move on her part, as NS did indeed almost go bankrupt.  If they had, and I had sold them World English rights, my series would have vanished into a black hole of bankruptcy court for many years.  But thankfully I knew that even if they did go bankrupt, I could always publish an English-language version in the UK &amp; import to US.)  Aaaaanyway.  As it turned out, a UK deal never quite materialized, and NS got bought out and the new owners pulled the DRM-free versions.  But that's the way things go in publishing: you make the best decisions you can with the info you have at the time.  Sometimes it works out, sometimes it doesn't.  
What? They have their own bill board? No, this simply wont do! I'll look in to this Kick Starter thing.
Pepsi is sweeter than Coke
Are you talking about removing the ability to post links entirely or am i mistaken?
actually i got cleaned and sold them, but that isn't really the issue. NMZ doesn't effect your gameplay, and infact makes it better, while letting other people experience other parts of the game. What if I think that runecrafting should be removed without a poll, cause I don't like it
Yeah do you guys sell knives? What brands ?
Geno and Huber both back in training camp! Shaping up to be a great season for the 'Gals
Sorry. I was on mobile. 
I wish we could buy any houses from that vicinity. That area by the beach is as calm and relaxing to me as paleto bay.
as far as i know, yes.
Does he ever acquire the crossing ability he so dearly craves? No, no, don't tell me, I'll find out myself.
Never understood that.   *"Girlllll, you are going to be A-OK. We just need to get you out in public so we can find an intoxicated stranger to stuff his penis in you. Provided you don't get an STD, a stalker or pregnant, you will feel sooooo much better"*
That's my birthday, I should post an ama at the same time.  "I am a very boring person AMA"
Anyone else getting sick of being a paraplegic and trying to compete with Olympians?
Ya but they are pretty much shaped plywood.
He said chronically, which means you do it a shit ton. 
Fucking spoiler alert.
Orlando City play Charlotte Saturday evening at 7:30 at Wide World of Sports complex out at Disney. Always a good time!
That's the reason why I am waiting to marry my gf 
Soccer gets hot and heavy in the locker rooms. These two just couldn't wait for that.
Well Timmy, grown ups often times don't like to ask for money for things like a vacation, or a new toy. Often times they prefer to save up and buy these things themselves. Sometimes mommies and daddies don't always have an extra $300 to lend away for a vacation or a new toy. You'll understand when you're older.
I went with white tee shirts over my pots to help keep them cool!    [Imgur](http://i.imgur.com/99S0uCx)   So since I have city water, I need to de-chlorinate and add a little CalMag to them. (pH TBD) I might just end up with a plastic trash can and open top watering can for ease of use.   * Fill   * Adjust   * Water   * Drain extra  No air stone needed then.  I am just surprise there are not more write ups and how to's!  There are a million write ups on space buckets, COB LEDS, nutes, nutes and more nutes, but watering is like in the stone ages! :)
Twitter is a great way of rapidly transmitting and collecting information.  Aside from that, the activism part is probably not too impactful.  I mostly use it for the news and mockery.
Awesome just added it on stitcher! I'll check it out tomorrow and let you know. Thank you  
Same thing, insulin shorterened = slin and pin = needle. Just get yourself some 29g 0.5inch insulin needles you'll be good 
Decide what you want to spend on a car and stick to that, press all the numbers (financing, insurance, purchase price) to fit that number. Make sure this is done before you even take a step towards a car deal. Don't talk to any car dealers until you've sorted out and gotten approved financial deal.   As for lease/buy, depends on? -do you always wants a car payment but love having a newer-ish car and dont drive too far? lease is ok, but i'm hard pressed to ever endorse a lease. For me, buying car is only way because on leases, there's always some trigger sticking in your business, checking how many miles you drive, dings/dents on the car, and some pressure to change or upgrade your car (and keep you on a lease).  If mazda3 looks good, check into the other similar models and do compare/contrast. Don't sweat going to dealers and test driving, they'll hard press you, but just do it anyways. I use to feel bad for the sales guy if i walked, but do it. Be comfortable walking away from the dealer, dont listen to 'last and best deal' etc. if possible, check into just renting whatever car you are hard core thinking about..the 15min test drive never reveals all likes/dislikes, but will be revealed if rent a car over a day or weekend.  anyhow have fun car shopping, i actually like it now..
Was there ever a v10f? 
Darwin
I don't like to simplify things quite like that, but it seems to be the concensus. 
This is why I sometimes miss CRT screens. And then I remember resolution.
&gt; How about ------ stops calling me fat and how about you don't tell me what to do I'm entitled to say how I feel about people with rail thin bodies  Holy shit.  That is the most paradoxical doublespeak I have ever seen/heard I fear it will tear apart the very fabric of the universe.
I suspect that if, at eleven years old, he didn't know to keep his arm out of a tiger cage...learning lessons is not something he's good at.
They could've given him any generic action film. Bare in mind they gave Miz and DiBiase jr their own movies and they weren't as big stars, nor look as intimidating, as big Dave.
Reminds me of Sonic Drive-In's "Cheese Fries".  This picture is actually on their website.  http://sonicmenu.s3.amazonaws.com/5761401182087.10262.png  Perhaps you prefer "Cheesy Tots"?  http://sonicmenu.s3.amazonaws.com/5201400755475.77475.png  Just for fun, here's Snuffer's cheese fries:  http://1.bp.blogspot.com/_qwr2leT79q0/S8gTTQjlbiI/AAAAAAAAACs/cvAiERv_IPc/s1600/Fries.jpg
I remember it was more of her saying you should be able to skip the games part of games....and just get the story. Not that it makes the situation any better, but that's what I remember. She was also called Hamburger Helper.
It took you ten years to realize that??? I realized it by my second year! Restaurant managers are by and large some of the biggest douchebag retards on the planet. There are definitely some good ones, but its an easy 20-1 ratio in favor of the retards.
As nice as the sweet back is your cute little slit peeking out of those sexy red panties is just too much.  
Super sex powers?
Invite please GT PFKnone
Gravity is simply a form of acceleration production.  It's possible we do not fully understand dark matter interacts in truth with acceleration rather than gravity.
My mother and her sister, when they were kids, sat on their front porch eating watermelon and were spitting the seeds into the yard. I guess the watermelon vines took over and they had to tear up the yard to get rid of them.
She's such a karma train you literally no longer have to title your posts. Any gibberish will do
How? Besides 1860, though.
probably so people read little of the article and post comments like the ones in at the bottom.   I wonder if the plane was tracking Russian shipping from St Petersburg to Kaliningrad.  
So edit...?
Heres what I got.  Case - £26 Not entirely sure why I can't get this on PCPartPicker I think it's compatible and cheaper than most stuff on there.  http://www.aria.co.uk/Products/Components/Cases/Midi+Tower/BitFenix+Neos+ATX+Tower+Black%2FBlack+?productId=61207 [PCPartPicker part list](http://uk.pcpartpicker.com/p/4QtM4D) / [Price breakdown by merchant](http://uk.pcpartpicker.com/p/4QtM4D/by_merchant/)  Type|Item|Price :----|:----|:---- **CPU** | [AMD FX-8320 3.5GHz 8-Core Processor](http://uk.pcpartpicker.com/part/amd-cpu-fd8320frhkbox) | £97.00 @ Scan.co.uk  **CPU Cooler** | [Cooler Master Hyper 212 EVO 82.9 CFM Sleeve Bearing CPU Cooler](http://uk.pcpartpicker.com/part/cooler-master-cpu-cooler-rr212e20pkr2) | £24.98 @ CCL Computers  **Motherboard** | [MSI 970A-G43 ATX AM3+ Motherboard](http://uk.pcpartpicker.com/part/msi-motherboard-970ag43) | £45.36 @ Amazon UK  **Memory** | [Patriot Signature 8GB (2 x 4GB) DDR3-1600 Memory](http://uk.pcpartpicker.com/part/patriot-memory-psd38g1600kh) | £52.98 @ Ebuyer  **Storage** | [Western Digital RE3 1TB 3.5" 7200RPM Internal Hard Drive](http://uk.pcpartpicker.com/part/western-digital-internal-hard-drive-wd1002fbys) | £30.99 @ Amazon UK  **Video Card** | [Sapphire Radeon R9 270X 2GB Dual-X Video Card](http://uk.pcpartpicker.com/part/sapphire-video-card-112170120g) | £129.98 @ Novatech  **Power Supply** | [EVGA 500W 80+ Certified ATX Power Supply](http://uk.pcpartpicker.com/part/evga-power-supply-100w10500kr) | £30.70 @ Amazon UK  **Wireless Network Adapter** | [TP-Link TL-WN821N 802.11b/g/n USB 2.0 Wi-Fi Adapter](http://uk.pcpartpicker.com/part/tp-link-wireless-network-card-tlwn821n) | £7.78 @ CCL Computers   | | **Total**  | Prices include shipping, taxes, and discounts when available | £419.77  | Generated by PCPartPicker 2014-08-01 00:53 BST+0100 | I wanted to overclock the CPU to about 4 GHz, with an SSD it will probably run at 420W, I'm pretty sure I need a bigger PSU, any suggestions on how large it should be?  Thanks again.
It's really hard to do a test like that because pepsi and coke are generally the same thing (but do have different recipes). Personally I notice a difference in the taste between different fountains (say at a gas station versus a movie theater or something) with just pepsi alone. I also notice a difference between bottled and canned pepsi, both of those are also different in taste from fountain. It has to do with the amount of syrup added to the carbonated water. I do notice a difference between coke and pepsi. I like coke, but I like pepsi better, if there isn't pepsi, I will take coke sometimes.  Edit: sorry for the double reply.
I'll have you know my D is eleven returns long.
Viva la Blackhawks!!
haha
He's a good player. It's pretty simple. I'm not claiming he's a world beater, but definitely a good fullback for his age, and our best choice. And it does say much when you're competing with those players for spots. 
I think we can just chalk it up to a "decision"
sent! (10)
He's saying Ochoa is underrated and should have gotten to a top team. 
Unless next year goes much better, I see Kimi becoming disinterested and walking away for good after the season and I'd really hate to see him go out like that. It's horrible to watch.
Damn, I would love to. ;)
Technically, I'm obese, but I "wear it well."
I CAME HERE TO POST THIS.  Oh my god, we're all going to diiieeeeeee.
ok thank you
"Deleted or Removed"  kek
looks like Susan's gap to me.
* "nonsensical" ban  *"This brings to light a pretty cut and ~~dry~~ dried issue not many people know/care about. For those who aren't familiar, snus is a ~~swedish~~ Swedish smokeless, spitless tobacco product different from dip or chew. It has some of the lowest health risks of any consumption method associated with it, to the extent that there has never been a conclusive link between it and oral cancer. As an American who enjoys his ~~nictotine~~ nicotine, snus is a ~~god send~~ godsend. I enjoy it more than smoking, not just using it as a safer alternative.(?) Many people who have tried it feel the same way~~,~~. ~~it's~~ It's even being sold at many ~~7/11s~~ 7-Elevens in America now. Obviously I'm not arguing that it's risk free or that the graphs here tell the whole story, but it's impossible to argue it isn't clearly and significantly safer than not only cigarettes, but also other smokeless tobacco products. While obviously not many smokers would switch immediately, it's ~~absolutly~~ absolutely senseless to rob smokers of availability to a much safer product for ostensibly no reason."*  You aren't doing your side any favors. Your submission statement is a rant that makes a lot of unsupported claims, while the article you linked is an editorial from a pro-snus website. This is not even close to being a /r/TrueReddit  quality submission.
He said good servers will still be able to support themselves. The only current servers that can are servers that aren't as popular. None of the popular servers can support themselves with the rules Mojang provided. They have tried and it never works. He said it will work for good servers and since none of the current servers work then he is saying they are not good.
Bacon is gross.
That's not okay, Usually people on this subreddit are pretty accepting of transpeople, just not self absorbed special snowflakes. (which admittedly she is) There's plenty to dislike about this post without misgendering her though. 
Word.
That is one of my favorite quotes. 
Oh, okay.
/r/naturebeingajerk 
COCCAAAAAAAAAAAAAINE!!!
That's such a nice countertop 
What's wrong with red paint? It's one of the colours we use. 
I feel like today made this place more like home. 
Deposited: Lv.15 Female Luvdisc  I would like a bulbasaur please  IGN: Artemis
Make like your username and
As a huge Buffy fan, I am deeply disappointed by this.
in the sentence もし雨が降ったら、行きません  why do you need もし？doesn't ったらalready serve the purpose of "if" Would   雨が降ったら、行きません  be exactly the same? Or does the first one hold some type of slight nuance difference or something?
Thank you very much for the chat command!
The Burger Brawl!!!
Kat Dennings (2 Broke Girls)
I just did a swatch/review post on them here: http://www.reddit.com/r/Indiemakeupandmore/comments/2cac4x/rave_performance_colours_swatches_review/  I LOVE her lipsticks. Amazing wear time, great colour payoff (just not Badlands, don't do it). Her colours are more natural, red, and purple or berry, versus Limnit has some unusual colours available. 
This is actually fucking incredible. 
Every police department has dozens of systems, not all of them properly maintained. This one was probably a small utility that a not very security-conscious admin left on a server, using a hard-coded password.
&gt; There are plenty of people who could be retiring and yet refuse.  Refuse, or can't because their kids just got outta college and won't pay their own insurance, rent, phone bill, etc. etc.
&gt; O's &lt;3  FTFY
I fucking hate it when the gays tackle me and grab my small dick, which is never because that isn't a thing that happens.  Who needs an escape with God on your side though, right?
Your post has been removed. We use the reddit [FAQ guidelines for spam](http://www.reddit.com/wiki/faq#wiki_what_constitutes_spam.3F) when removing spam posts. Additionally, as a spam-prevention measure, users with accounts that have low activity (less than 5 combined karma) and/or are less than 14 days old, may be subject to having their posts removed. If you believe your participation on the site falls within reddit's guidelines of [reddiquette](http://www.reddit.com/wiki/reddiquette) and ["FAQ - What constitutes spam?",](http://www.reddit.com/wiki/faq#wiki_what_constitutes_spam.3F) please [message the mod team](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fgadgets) for reconsideration.  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fgadgets) if you have any questions or concerns.*
**Bug Fixes:** * Fixed various issues in Frostgorge Sound events.   * Adjusted the difficulty of champion tendrils in Mordrem events in the Iron Marches.   * Fixed an issue in which the “Coat yourself in Mordrem spores to baffle Mordrem defenses and gather samples from the vine chambers” event in the Iron Marches was stalling.   * Fixed an issue in which the Mordrem wolves would incorrectly spawn at the start location of the “Stop Mordrem from spreading corrupted tendrils in the Iron Marches” event.   * Increased the time between enemy waves in the “Help Arcanist Xanf set up his spectral disruptor” event in Cursed Shore.
It's a hell of a [drug]( http://www.draftdaysuit.com/wp-content/uploads/2011/11/cocainesahellofadrug.jpg)
Really cool man, the composition is great, but it could benefit from several hours programming to be more expressive for sure, in particular the drums 
Could you post a screenshot of the actual utility screen?  The normal view isn't too useful.
Could it be nutritional?  (I've known a lot of people who get like this when they're mostly eating carbs, rather than greens, proteins, etc. Just a thought.)
Cry about it?
who cares really?   They have the same eyes, that's what matters :D
beautiful chick, beautiful backyard.
So you don't understand what quotes are either.  Sheesh, you're like a fuckwit only less intelligent.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=03T2pKO8ItE
I would assume it would cost me $60 to change this IF a character appearance change option were already in place, which it isn't, and if it isn't, then they shouldn't be changing ppls appearances
But I absolutely feel that looking-back-on-high-school grief, for me it was when I realised I literally had lost my jaw line through getting chubbier after I turned 19 and it was time to maybe do something about it.. it's crushing because it's weight that you don't even notice putting on, so annoying.
What do you think of my outfit? It's for the first day a school: http://i.imgur.com/xfGASdU.jpg
Awwwww *blushing* quit it. Thank you!  (✿◠‿◠)
I'm sure players don't give a fuck when they talk shit on their game, but when you start bringing up family and personal shit up. Thats when a player might get pissed.  and Lebron handled this the right way, he probably could have had the fan kicked out but he warned him first.
EVOLVE OR PERISH!!!
im not breakin any rules i was banned unjustly  i mean dinokid aint breakin any rules
I agree with this completely, I can't think of a single thing that torres has over shurlle in that position
I could show you a white banana. If you wanted to see it I could show it to you.
I got 3U and unite.
Damn you, Homer reference. 
do you mean Concorde Cafe on Fishponds Road? (which is directly opposite the turn in for the Lodge Causeway) Because as far as greasy, unholy but amazing hangover breakfasts go, Concorde won every time. Plus, less than a fiver and cheap. 
The video game beyond two souls. Don't get me wrong it's a terrible video game but it should not make me this furious
http://mspaintadventures.com/?s=6&amp;p=006702
#**NOTICE**: This thread is the target of a *possible* downvote brigade from *[/r/Shitstatistssay](http://np.reddit.com/r/Shitstatistssay/comments/2cafe5/the_notion_that_government_is_inefficient_is_just/)*^submission ^linked  **Submission Title:**  * *The notion that government is inefficient is just pro-corporate propaganda!*  **Members of *[/r/Shitstatistssay](http://np.reddit.com/r/Shitstatistssay/comments/2cafe5/the_notion_that_government_is_inefficient_is_just/)* involved in this thread:**^list ^updated ^every ^5 ^minutes ^for ^12 ^hours  -----  ^★ *^It ^is ^an ^obvious ^fact ^that ^the ^banks ^and ^big ^monopolies ^are ^now ^dependent ^on ^the ^state ^for ^their ^survival. ^As ^soon ^as ^they ^were ^in ^difficulties, ^the ^same ^people ^who ^used ^to ^insist ^that ^the ^state ^must ^play ^no ^role ^in ^the ^economy, ^ran ^to ^the ^government ^with ^their ^hands ^out, ^demanding ^huge ^sums ^of ^money. ^And ^the ^government ^ ^immediately ^gave ^them ^a ^blank ^cheque. ^Trillions ^of ^pounds ^of ^public ^money ^has ^been ^handed ^over ^to ^the ^banks, ^totalling ^some ^$14trillion. ^But ^the ^crisis ^continues ^to ^deepen.* ^★   [^|bot ^twitter ^feed|](https://twitter.com/bot_redd)
Why would they pick a fight with an ally?
[Hamilton gets the runner out at home](http://gfycat.com/WeakBonyFritillarybutterfly)  Sorry it's late, but I've still got some problems (this one is in slow motion)
OK. Just talk to the legal aid. Maybe they can get her back on SSI and Medicaid. Unfortunately Texas did not participate in ObamaCare Medicaid expansion and this is why your Mother may not be able to get coverage. 
Meetup.com is pretty much the best place to meet people.   It's designed for strangers to meet strangers and befriend them. Many events have icebreakers and definitely try to keep the awkwardness to a minimum   Also your city might have a subreddit. Many are active and a fantastic resource 
I did that. I was looking for a place I could search by location because it doesn't seem like there are going to be any on Arizona. I suppose the closest is in California 
paypal?
I don't want to be the dick that says that technically they don't have the 07 premiership, but you know............ just saying.  
Also not an analog as not even they use families as shields. Gang rules are that violence is supposed to be kept away from families, that's why most drive bys are in public not at people's homes. Collateral damage does happen but at least they frown on it and attempt to avoid it. The one very notable exception would be MS13 which will kill you anywhere, but even they usually leave families alone and frown on using them as shields.   Truthfully there is no analog, not the nazis, not the Huns, none of the worst people in history ever used innocents as a meat shield.  Only Hamas. And the willingness to do so makes them the absolute worst of human scum. I would be on the Palestinians side, and was until this, but they are the most disgusting and cowardly group I've ever heard of. 
Did they say anything about WHY they changed her?
Honestly that doesn't even completely represent my music taste fully. Generally I go to blues and any of it's sub genres, but it's not odd for me to listen to folk, celtic, classic rock, or pretty much any other genre.
It's funny, because it's similar to the way that the girls/boys receive the news. The girls rush to the people's side and comfort them, the boys internalize and then might give them a heartfelt pat later on.   Similarly, when Frankie (who reacts to things with similar mannerisms as the girls in the house) heard of the loss, he wanted comfort from friends and to externalize his emotions. Derrick wanted time alone.   Interesting how different psychology works.
You guys sure do fix bugs fast when you get reports. Always good to see heheh.  Also, gunslinger bullets moving faster... I like this. :D
My husband and I got our rings from 4℃ and we absolutely love them! They're really unique and beautiful~ 
Linking life to work is the absurd part.  That's why I support  the universal basic income.  It eliminates the need for a minimum wage and goes some distance in decoupling human life from economic values.  Also what's up with the predominantly black neighborhood line?  If you meant poor area or bad part of town its better to use those words. 
True, but since it's at a hospital it could've been an emergency.  Just saying. Either way, yeah I know people can be pretty careless.
Enough to masturbate for 4 hours ?
You've won the internet for today, sir.
no, sorry
Still can dodge the rocket at 40m....
Time to start looking for another job.
Its okay guys, I played infected inc. I got this.
BVAHAHAHAHAHAA  Someone gild this man. Or woman.
It's pretty great
Thanks, didn't even know there was one! Glad I'm not the only one anyway. I half expected someone to point it out in settings or something! 
She sat, somber, tears making their way down her cheeks. Earth's light, dimming with each passing second, reflected in her eyes.  Darkness was surrounding her. All of the stars and galaxies seemed too far away. Sadness seemed to pull her heart against her chest, as her child lay dying in her arms.  As the light went out, tears clouded her eyes. A sob escaped, bringing with it the rushing pain of loss. She succumbed to it, and lay weeping into the darkness. The void did nothing to comfort her.  She lay crying for a long time.  Finally, she sat up, wiping tears away. She looked out over the great expanse. The thought of moving on and not knowing how to enveloped her in fear. It was paralyzing.  In the distance, something caught her eye. Just a glint of light among all the other glints of light in the void.  A star was radiating it's light in the distance. The light bounced off surrounding stars and planets, but it was glinting off something specific.  She wiped her eyes and squinted. She held hear breath, not wanting to hope.  Suddenly, she smiled.  The light traveled from the star to a distant planet. She could just barely make it out, but from where she sat she knew what it was.  Water. Teeming with life.
Literacy has nothing to do with implications. The word "average" was neither used nor implied, which in my book makes his statement false.
Power ball all the way.  It's also great for your forearms and a crazy muscle that blew up on my thumb on the top of my hand.
Then your glasses would break and you wouldn't be able to read all them books. U fuckd
Totally fixable probably, just look up how to fix loose USB ports. I'm sure there's something that can be done friend.
You speak jive better than the kid
Have they even confirm the prize pool for this year?
you would be very hated in /r/Roadcam.  every time a non-north american video shows up one of these comments are bound to happen.
It's been 10 days since he last commented. I doubt he's coming. 
First wash the walls good with TSP to get a clean wall to start with, doing your spackling at this point. We've had good luck with the Glidden Gripper primer available at Home Depot. For the paint, we like the Valspar that Lowe's sells, Consumer Reports had Valspar listed as their #2 pick for paint behind Benjamin Moore but Valspar is much cheaper. Most of the rest of the stuff both Lowe's and Home Depot sells is not very good quality IMO.   For a bathroom you'll  probably want to go with a semi-gloss paint which withstands moisture better but will show up defects in the wall or painting technique moreso than a flat or eggshell finish will. Do not skimp on the quality of your roller cover, every bit of lint coming off the roller will show up in the paint. I would suggest going with an off-white or antique white rather than a bright white because the bright white is hard on the eyes and looks dingy quickly.  Don't be shy about trying out a high-contrast dark color for your trim if you're going with a white wall, or if it's a larger bathroom maybe consider doing a two-color wall with the bottom 36" (wainscot or chair-rail height) a darker color.   Edit to add: Latex paint is mostly water used as a carrier to get the pigments and the solids on the wall, the solids weigh more than the water so generally the heavier the paint, the more solids and the better the quality.
Climbing is great excercise for the brain and the body. You learn to push yourself to do things that you don't dare to do, and you get so much excercise. I eat like the fattest dude in the world but i don't look like it just because of climbing, it's like cheating.
Eh we're doing pretty good...unlike NK with its concentration camps and people starving to death...
Looks as if people still remain here, frozen in time ,cool.
I saw the thumbnail yet I clicked anyway. I still don't know what I was expecting here.
Primary school was non-scripture for me. Most useless use of one hour a week if you ask me for everyone.  Religion or anything close to it shouldn't be taught or 'encouraged' in public schools.
You also get an up vote for the user name alone. ;)
The kindly man / Aemon Targaryen
I love the dude wearing 2 pairs of sunglasses at 3:43
Well, if I was offered the option of being brutally raped and stabbed at gunpoint or being drugged and raped while unconscious, I know which I would choose. Just becuase A is worse than B it doesn't mean that B is in any way acceptable. If all he is saying is that all rapes are not the same then he has a point. If he is saying, and he actually did seem to be, that gang rape at knife point by strangers is worse than date rape, then that is a tricky empirical question. But I'm pretty sure that I'd rather be raped drunk by an acqaintance than dragged off to a barn by a stranger at gunpoint. Joebloggy's point is valid. Why do you think all rapes are the same, but not, say, all thefts? 
Pretty much any post from /r/pics
Or... You know... Move out...
I'm finally not in debt anymore!
Vote Civilian.
100% totally agree. For monetary and health reasons it makes no sense for Cotto to fight GGG. Makes sense for GGG to call Cotto out because it would get him a big payday and the lineal MW championship. GGG needs to focus on unifying the belts then moving up to SMW and taking on the champs there - Froch, Bika, Abraham, etc...
Crazy wolfhead snowtard goes apeshit and hilarity ensues.
Indeed, CLG.EU was Froggen, WickD (members on Alliance), Krepo, Snoopeh and Yellowpete (who went to NA). The second best EU team in Season 2 and one of the only teams to have a winning record against Moscow 5. (Gambit and M5 are technically different teams even with the same players, I basically mean in season 2).
Nebraska here. You better have those rows straight all the way to the horizon or the neighbors will make your life miserable for years.
I think they meant it's tall enough to be a 2014-series Ghidorah.
It would be a big change to the game mechanics, there would be a huge riot about this tbh. They polled the thing where you had to interact within 10 minutes or you would get logged out, but it didn't pass.
Hayden/Nicole/Jocasta/Donny. Either one I'd be okay with. Maybe not Nicole, but I'd feel more comfortable with her as HOH than the others.
I'm being driven to the office in like fifteen minutes now.  Also, when will I take a written test?
Possible licensed store.  I have worked in a few stored and am in a licensed one now inside a water park.  Due to running extremely light labor we tend to cut our pastries and fraps down 10 minutes before we close essentially because management wants us out of the building as soon as possible.  Kind of sucks turning away people but at the same time we have two blenders going none stop literally the entire shift and only two people working.
Well i took the hubcaps off and it looks way more even.  Should i take it back to the shop?
yes I agree. I think the new read will understand more about the Dark Tower if they read some of his other works first.  If i might make a suggestion list, here are a few: Salems Lot, The Stand, Rose Madder, The Shining.  
it's not.
I guess you're right. I have to face that and earn my own money. 
Nice to meet you. I'm a Muggle and live in Wizard. Wait... 
Amazing, your xdressing rubber make me feel rock hard!
Hello we apologize for inconvenience we had fix the issue and that was due to faulty cache settings. Please let us know if you experience the same issue thanks so much
If you were to start a religion, first off that'd have to include more people or it would simply be your personal beliefs. Second of all there should be some kind of definition to it, so that you'd actually know that you have the same "base", rules, god etc.  I may disturb religious people here - sorry.  Some of the biggest and "strongest" religions out there have been created upon a need. That could be a need to unite people, money, politics etc. and a nice blend of em all. Wars had to be won, monuments to be build, peace to be settled and i could go on. Another critical point is "fear". With rules (koran and bible) of punishment and reward, and an invisible spiritual world, you get - "fear". Fear of a god is so strong that i makes men kill men everyday.
The fact that you pretend to know the balance of positives and negatives, both intended and unintended, now is straight hubris.
I agree with you. I love other hearing people's perspectives and experiences. 
oh god Lee looks like he's going to cry
I don't understand all of the fear of telling people you work on computers. I'm an IT guy and pick up side work occasionally. Do you just not want the extra income? I make decent money but making $100 for reformatting a PC while I play video games is just too easy to pass up. Really don't feel like doing something? Throw out a high enough price that will make it worth it to you. I had a guy wanting me to setup his wifi for him at his house. Didn't want to do it because he seemed like a weirdo but I still gave him a quote of $300 just to see if I could get some Best Buy style profit for easy work.
Twin boom best boom.
Currently. I mean before Islam and especially jihad Islam took over. 
I'd dare to say the secret technique way could be pretty harmful. It is more of a stretch to claim bullets are harmless without a gun. In the end though I think my lame attempt at humor was a little lost in translation.
For all intensive purposes, I think both ways work.
Serious relationship w/love -&gt; breakup -&gt; hearing about them with someone else.  Not angry feelings, but sad ones.  Because it's still soon enough that you miss them.
Kitty Ray Vaughan
You're not, I can never not laugh during this movie.  I'm not talking blowing air out of my nose either.
Have you ever tried the 'dry method' I used in one of my Stirling lather tutorials?   I found that method produced more consistently great lather. And although your current formula has a tendency to fail in my hard water ( so I usually use distilled for it), using the dry method had better results when I tested it formally.   I think this is because flooding the soap with too much (hard) water is easier to do with other methods.
Which one? I haven't seen it but I kinda want to google it
&gt; I am going to ignore the horrific grammar for a second. This also make some ridiculous false assumptions. The "government" isn't suing itself. A member of the Legislature is suing the POTUS for allegedly abusing his authority.  No the Speaker is using taxpayer money to sue the President for doing what the Speaker shut down the government for. He is not suing in a personal capacity. 
&gt;offensive touching  He's probably a sex offender.    Offensive Touching  A person commits offensive touching, an unclassified misdemeanor, in either of the two ways discussed below:  by intentionally touching, with a member of his or her body, or with any instrument, another person, knowing that the touching likely will cause offense or alarm to the other person, orby intentionally striking another person with saliva, urine, feces or any other bodily fluid, knowing that the striking likely will cause offense or alarm to the other person.  (11 Del. C. § 601)
Boulder karma, have you been throwing trash on the ground?
She can rebook, or use her words. Pretty simple. 
Holy shit, he did that in *one life.*  It took me 3 just to get to the first battle. Great job, Arin.
Same here
Derrick Rose
my reaction and what I was expecting  http://www.nkayesel.com/wp-content/uploads/2013/10/michael-scott-no.gif
A good offense to compliment Johnny though.
pfft. I can show you movies where you didn't even realize you were looking at CG effects.
This is also a great reminder of things to consider while crafting poems of our own. Thanks for the helpful post!
REKTHAM4LYF!!!  Dead Nan just to emphasise how low on the list you are!  ^^^But ^^^no, ^^^I ^^^loved ^^^the ^^^Rolling ^^^BC ^^^times. ^^^They'll ^^^always ^^^be ^^^my ^^^first.
I think he said it was pretty close to OP though. Which I would agree with. It's definitely on that edge, but not quite OP. If it was actually OP you would see everyone running around with snipers.
Market average for the serpent ft is around 62-63. I've got one for you for 25 keys.
Your only option is to convince her to move with you, even if it some time down the road.
Holy hell I didn't know that.   Wish I had more than one upvote to give you! That's way worse than I expected but that 10% number is higher than I expected.   Where did this Cone from? 
They started backtracking an hour ago saying that Sparks hasn't been the spokesperson for two weeks. But no one questioned his status as spokesperson when he made that post yesterday, and none of them called into the Rick Howe show this morning to correct him then either.
[Here you go](http://www.nerdwallet.com/student-credit-cards).  There is also [this guide](http://www.reddit.com/r/personalfinance/comments/241igc/the_new_credit_file_startup_kit/).  PSA: Always pay your statement balance in full every month. Only use credit for planned expenses.
She a ho, fo sho, but not all hos are cheaters.
Reminds me of Kevin Casey handing Spencer Pratt a brown(?) belt after only a couple of years of training.  [Casey was trying to jumpstart his rap career](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Nc2N2TiKI3o) and Pratt had industry connections at the time.  I think he even was in his video.
Op seems like a dude with the hair on his arms and the masculine belt, but could be a very masculine female too.
It's fine, that's kinda the problem, no one really knows about it sadly. So it's kinda forgotten about yet it's intent is to house all the models people wish to show off, it needs like advertising or something on this forum's sidebar.
Start with barrier spray. Follow the directions and put it on all of your exposed skin. Then, get some body paint. Snazaroo is the best, and don't let anyone tell you otherwise. Take a cosmetic sponge, get it wet first and then get the paint on it. Don't put the water on the paint and soak it up with the sponge, that doesn't work. Paint yourself, then paint again, making sure to avoid streaks and light patches.   Or you can just use creme stage makeup. It'll spread better, but you go through it faster. You can cut down on how much makeup you have to use by wearing long sleeves and long pants. As for tusks, you'll probably have to look online. 
Good. If I were an actor, I wouldn't want to work with a pedo anyway. Director, or not.
Tea? Like... hot tea?
Satan's a bit depressed because Sadam's been treating him like a little bitch.
yeah he admitted it in court and was Comvicted
Well if you match 4 green orbs, the attack of each ZGL is doubled and change. So 4x for ZGL turns into 8 for him. If any other subs have 2 two prong, they also get that multiplier.  Then there's ZGLs active. Which all adds up to about 1m damage for each ZGL. You can see this in /u/Gettingworst 's videos
They aren't, they're a product of the Iraq and Afghanistan wars. 
 It was a little cooler today, so you decide to wear that old coat you never really liked.    As you head out the door you put your hands in your pockets and find a surprise $20 bill.  What do you do with it?   &gt;
Didn't Gilgamesh have to run through a giant tunnel that the sun passed through on the way to the sky or something? 
Added!  Fun!
Well, if you want to belong to said religion, yes. Some people believe that this event or that event described in the Bible is metaphorical, and some believe it's actual, but as for the events described in this basic storyline, yes; most Christians believe it actually happened.
You better reduce that damn fraction
This is essentially tekkit
Episode 10....I'm pretty sure Mi Young still didn't sign the contract, right? I mean I looked when evil courtesan picked it up and didn't see a signature (I think). It seems like a contract wouldn't be legally binding if both parties hadn't signed it, at least. Also, no one noted that the money stipulation had been crossed out. I'm a little annoyed these things didn't come up. But I guess the problem is that the contract existed at all.  I don't think it's possible for Gun to go back now. He's obviously in love with Mi Young and *really* attracted to her (his hungry looks are making me crazy), so the only way I can think of for this show to mine any drama out of Se Ra, et al. is to trot out noble idiocy a la "I have hurt her so much and she has been miserable with me, she's better off without me in her life," and "he never wanted to be with me in the first place so I'll quietly stay out of his life like I promised," etc. Ugh. I really hope I'm wrong.
Zach and Victoria.  They will be in the same room, together.
Yeah, but at that point he had absolutely no adamantium in him. Magneto ripping all the alloy out of his body was what caused him to go feral in the first place.
But...but...that chequy water!
Oh, God, it's really happening!
I spent my whole first season watching the NBA thinking the Wizards played in Washington state and wondered why people cared so much about the Sonics moving. In my defence I don't live in the US. 
Same here. I just got an email stating that the decision will be available at 9:30 ET today. I am not having high hopes mainly because I think if I was selected they would have informed me much earlier. A weird thing that I did notice is that irrespective of career background/activities people on visa (like myself) have been rejected a lot. I know quite a lot of my friends who applied for the program and got rejected. I might be wrong but I do not what problem they have with people on valid visas. :(
I would be so torn between keeping it and eating it 
What stat? number of dead jews?
Original Post by: /u/Ender1987  Flair: [Covered by other articles]
Im a women and i would want to be able to read women mind bc i will know if they be talking shit about me 
I was being glib. It's a damn sight better than the Chupacabra that they drew for me in Miami.
Yea i think it was during VRchat session he joined.
A lot of ports things are wrong. Some scrimshaws still say crits
As for what it does, main thing is it limits rpm to 3200.
i can do 1 better http://imgur.com/a/6AgDK
*biggerbudget*
If you will lose lane otherwise, then yes. If the matchup is good enough that you can win lane without armor, then itemize mr.
My first time, I was about the same age. My brother and I both played 1st level Fighters in AD&amp;D and my dad was DM. Memory is a little fuzzy but it was a one-time adventure. He started us at a cave entrance. From there, we entered a cave and were assaulted by Kobolds. We died because we were pretty dumb but we had fun. Later on, my brother and I often played together with a D&amp;D starter set with pre-gen characters and adventures and then moved on to AD&amp;D 2nd ed together and with our parents later on.  I actually recommend you do an older version (like 1st ed D&amp;D or AD&amp;D) for simplicity sake. I don't know anything about 5e though.
oh.. it was the song that came to my mind when I saw your photo. :)
I said "or some bullshit" 
But is the paint raging-friends resistant? 
Or likes a good smack on the glutes like Bruce Campbell.
My department is being 'restructured' and instead of just giving us the new responsibilities and titles they are making all of us re-apply for our jobs, have posted our jobs online, and won't tell us if we have our jobs until a month from now. The kicker? The job descriptions are the EXACT SAME THING we are already doing.   My anxiety is through the roof. This is so fucked up. 
Oc
I haven't dropped this in years. 
"wanna see me run around the world...DONE!"
This helped a lot, thank you so much for responding.
I wonder why they go right to Bastardo here. Do they not have a long man they can use? 
My fiances grandma is like that. She is a very sweet woman, but if she puts stuff on your plate and you say stop, to her it just means that I want at least double of what I have already. Her food is really good, but I just don't understand that mentality. 
I think she tries to hard to be "one of us" or "down to earth".  She's not. She makes millions of dollars and is recognizable in many places around the world. Just seems like an act, and I'll never understand the praise she gets.
6', 213 lbs and falling. I am not athletic per se but when I worked in construction I was known for feats of strength.
Dude I was at a car show in Rochester NH and this dude rolled up in one of these puppies and revved the engine when he pulled up and I of course as a grown man hearing that I screeched like a little girl. Then the man proceeded to roll down the isle for a parking spot cruised by me and noticed me having a heart attack over this freekin car. He than sopped and like a true bad ass looks over at me turning his head smoothly and leisurely and said "get in" and of course I opened the door cautiously thinking that the slightest gust of wind is going to break the car, I then sat in it and closed the door. Again like a TRUE bad ass he opened up the the glove box to pull out yet a second pair of aviators and he told me to put them on. He then backed up and pulled back out of the car show. We literally cruised around all day in that car and I believe I came several times and it was amazing and everything was perfect. That is the most vivid memory that I could possibly remember. Thus ends the the story when I felt like a true bad ass 
I also think he was intentionally ambiguous. He probably wants you to know that he likes you a lot and loves your company. That does not mean he is IN love with you, yet. It's really not cool for him to be so ambiguous though. Update us if you do talk with him soon.
Top Swain. Why does nobody play top Swain?
Both are very fucking sexy but if I MUST pick one, back. 
[**@pyroballyhoo**](https://twitter.com/pyroballyhoo): &gt;[2014-07-31 18:41:30 UTC](https://twitter.com/pyroballyhoo/status/494915776608878592)  &gt;How was JR involved in my TNA exit? EXCLUSIVE column up for "THE BRAND" at VIP site at [*pyroandballyhoo.com*](http://pyroandballyhoo.com)  ----  [^[Mistake?]](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=TweetPoster&amp;subject=Error%20Report&amp;message=http://reddit.com/2cafgu%0A%0APlease leave above link unaltered.) [^[Suggestion]](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=TweetPoster&amp;subject=Suggestion) [^[FAQ]](http://np.reddit.com/r/TweetPoster/comments/13relk/) [^[Code]](https://github.com/buttscicles/TweetPoster) [^[Issues]](https://github.com/buttscicles/TweetPoster/issues)
More like gone mild am I right?
This makes me hurt for the lonely birdy
Put in the new Indian god that nulls all damage. 
gotta watch this before youtube yanks it off.
Thank you so much!! These will be a big help.
What have you been drinking? I get that some drinks are an acquired taste, but there's plenty of mix drinks that exists where you can't taste the alcohol in it.
Please. Yes please. 
Nice
&gt; There was a team of programmers in Hyderabad, however they just got laid off because 50 of them did as good work as a team of the 10 in America. This is because our structure focuses on being agile and adaptable. It is cheaper to pay 10 Americans to do that than 50 Indians and 8 American managers to tell them exactly what to do.  Also, a lot of the savings get wasted in the 24 hour turnaround time. Those 10 American programmers can get something written, reviewed, changed, and re-reviewed in an afternoon. That same process might take a week for overseas developers, just by virtue of being 12 timezones away.
Not an improvement IMO...  ...now if the Heep were black to start...
you can replace them with a fel or a grah :p
Diplomacy  Kemet  SmallWorld
Yeah, it started like a week ago. It's anything but official, though.
**FUCKIN A. FUCK YOU ISIS COCKSUCKERS!**
Nice 4Chan meme man
But if the water arm lady is a good enough water bender to make her arms as versatile as they are without much movement. She is probably a strong enough bender to bloodbend amon. At least enough to make the 4 of them a threat.
I know why TJ is an ass but what has Repzion done?
People seem to forget that we have sales tax over here. Check it. Tax free the difference will be negligible. 
Great seller! Super fast, excellent communication. :)
CHRIST. that is some sexy underwear. I love this set 
The problem is even if you post it's so out there that people might just assume you made it up
This is one of my trigger pics. His hair was lethal in Poland, and this pic is lethal to me now. FUCK. 
"Do I really look like a guy with a plan?"
Sigh.   [Rod Blagojevich](http://i2.cdn.turner.com/dr/hln/www/release/sites/default/files/imagecache/textarticle_640/2012/04/23/blagojevich-washing-dishes.jpg).
I wrote that in a hurry.  I meant you should skim Hull which you mention in your post. You may want to do the same with Bodie first, so you're at least conversational in some of the topics.
**[Original Submission by /u/somebliss](http://www.reddit.com/r/Defiance/comments/2c8gf5/defiant_few_weekly/)** into /r/Defiance  ---  # Subreddit Overview * A community for: **3 years** * # of subscribers: **4,488** * # of mods: **3** * Subscribers per mod: **1,496**  # Popular Posts Summary * Top domains: self.Defiance **(79%)**, youtube.com **(6%)**, gonnageek.com **(3%)** * % NSFW: **1%** * Average Score: **5**  # Discussion Summary * Average Comment Length: **~51** words per comment * Flesch-Kincaid Reading Level: **5** * Comments per post: **~8**  # A sampling of top posts: * Top all time: [SyFy renews Defiance for a Second Season (240 points by /u/whatevrmn)](http://www.reddit.com/r/Defiance/comments/1e2tid/syfy_renews_defiance_for_a_second_season/) * Top this month: [[Episode Discussion] S02E03 - "The Cord and the Ax " (32 points by /u/jimmyolsenblues)](http://www.reddit.com/r/Defiance/comments/29sm0k/episode_discussion_s02e03_the_cord_and_the_ax/) * Top this week: [Someone Needs to Tell Trion Worlds How to Run Defiance (28 points by /u/garfi3ld)](http://www.reddit.com/r/Defiance/comments/2c5ge9/someone_needs_to_tell_trion_worlds_how_to_run/)  ## **[Subscribe at /r/Defiance](/r/Defiance)**   
I enjoy both. 
It's called a Roll-Up strategy where you just issue shares and buy up all the competition and roll all the customers into one platform and one revenue stream then you become a giant powerful company.
oh damn your right. I was thinking watts, not amps. yet another edit to this. thanks bud!
I think I might seem desperate. I wouldnt say she is enthusiastic about talking to me or meeting me.
confirmed
Holy fuck, a purge related question that doesn't completely suck balls. Good job OP I didn't think it was possible. 
Should have smoked some weed. Would have saved his life. 
Maybe (and I know this is a completely revolutionary idea) they could ask the community? I know! Who would have ever thought of that!?
I do like this wallpaper though!  If you are going to redo it, I recommend a solid dark gray fill on the dauntless logo and text and a light grey wallpaper.  I'll draft one to show you what I mean :-)
Hey guys I would be interested as well and have been looking for a team to play in the Canadian cup. I am about 3.6k solo rating and am best at Offlaners and carries but can also play most supports.  http://steamcommunity.com/id/pojoman  http://dotabuff.com/players/32439325
Anything! I d-didn't know any of th-this existed!
*She stopped.* "Oh? Hello, Von."
I'm confused...does that mean you prefer pancakes?
yea I edited it to clarify. I know they released the album, just didn't know they actually released the film to a select few and that was it
[Removed from /r/worldnews](http://www.reddit.com/r/ModerationLog/comments/2cafif/in_gaza_11_members_of_a_palestinian_family_are/) [Covered by other articles]
I think so. It looks like one of the Used Car guys is trading in his car and buying the last one we needed.   I've got a newegg shopping cart filled with $1,600 worth of stuff, and if all goes well I'll be ordering it.
There is one issue with using the TGP for targeting that I am aware of and that is when you set the SPI with the TGP at a low altitude the TGP actually will target the ground through the vehicle that you are targeting. So imagine the line from the TGP to and through the target and on to the ground. The point where that line hits the ground is the actual place that the bomb is going to hit. That said, if the line through the target does not hit the ground elevation because it is on a hill or you are targeting at a very low angle the actual impact point could be off many meters. Even with this I don't know if it is going to be 100 to 200 meters as you experienced. However with a few other variables you could experience those distances. I Hope you understand what I am trying to describe here. In other words the closer to and higher you are when you set your SPI the more accurate the bomb hits will be.
It's not metalcore, okay?
" I'm Sammy and thats Tyler And we came to get wild and style in these trench coats! Don't start asking whats packin in these trench coats! just know if you start acting I'm grabbin for these trench coats!
oh sweet it's powercow, the typical /r/politics troll - aren't you in the wrong sub?
Interesting take on replacing Harvest with Earthens. I can see it. It also in effect replaces Healing Touch since, so you're trading 3 cards in for 2, which is nice.  Personally if I would make changes, if I wanted to go more minion heavy, I'd probably take out Starfall and Thalnos for 2 Sludge Belchers, been loving the card in Ramp Taunt so far. I understand Starfall and Thalnos can be good against Zoo and Shaman, both problem decks for Druid, but at the same time they usually need to be played as part of a combo (Thalnos especially obviously) and this deck doesn't have strong card draw to begin with. On the otherhand, Sludge Belcher is also good against Zoo and decent against Shamans and can just be played as is. Also against mid/control match ups, having Sludges gives me the ability to play Druid of the Claws in Charge form much more liberally, which usually lets me trade or remove threats efficiently, which was always a problem with Ramp.  Also, this is more off kilter, but I'd probably remove one Ancient of War with a Loathub. I know it seems weird to take one of your biggest taunts out of your deck, but I find that having two usually just ends up clogging my hand, so expensive you're basically devoting an entire turn to it, and usually the fate of the game is decided already whether you win or lose by then if it's coming to that. I just put Loathub in there because Ramp has such a bad match up against Miracle (double Sap says hi) that it's my anti-Miracle tech card. If Loathub wasn't out, I'd put the 2nd AoW in there probably, but with the addition of 2 Sludge Belchers especially, I think there's enough taunts already. I rather have a good solid tech card (that's not bad on stats either) than add an 11th taunt to an already taunt heavy deck.
I don't mind it when they say "Arsenal in for X player". At least they have the balls to actually say something. Just saying "Arsenal are probably going to sign someone relatively soon-ish!" is just shit though.
Parkway Drive-Boneyards
the would rather have it now than save up for 4 months to get it.
This submission has been randomly featured in /r/serendipity, a bot-driven subreddit discovery engine. More here: http://www.reddit.com/r/Serendipity/comments/2cafim/defiant_few_weekly_xpost_from_rdefiance/
I already have a competitive shiny frog :U and I'm not sure if I'm interested on the eevee...
Pepsi is sweeter, Coke has more bite.
Nope, pretty sure it's not a bus.
/facepalm
This rule actually applies to any public place, it's just that many parents these days ignore it.
I'd love some help! Thank you!
Hockey is for girls m8 
I'd say No 
That's what people said about Richardson last year and Brown ended up with the starting role. Just sayin'.
I was so sad I stopped caring about everything. 
&gt; perhaps your serotonin requires fixed amount a time to replenish?  Psychedelics usually don't release serotonin. No one really knows what causes HPPD and similar.
How long has it been since the pain meds were given?  Hydromorphone can cause sedation, but usually wears off in 8-12 hours.
If you're not seeing weight loss at the rate you want, then kick the calories lower. 
[[Is not working.](http://media.tumblr.com/tumblr_lplb22ruOd1qkdve1.gif)]
Counselling can help. 
I feel like "trigger" is now just used for things people don't like. If I'm running late to an appointment, don't tell me the time, as it will "trigger" me.
Depends, were these viral / bacterial genes the result of an infection, or a mad scientist trying to make the ultimate super soldier? 
But if Debuchy gets a long term injury can Chambers who is only 19 do the job week in week out
If that is what I think it is, then that is part of the WP 8.1
I traded an Imposter Ditto with a passerby. The OT is in Japanese. The ID No. is 46460.
Waaaay too long.
Yes, he took the shot when he knew he could guarantee a good center mass hit. No need to be quick-draw McGraw if you can't hit a damn thing.  My instructor told us one simple thing: Every bullet you fire will have a lawyer attached to it. I think the guard fired the least number of rounds necessary to end the situation, and that's really the best outcome. Any more and there's concerns of hitting people on the street outside or next door, and nobody wants that.
Some areas are currently a death sentence if you go shooting a weapon.  I imagine it will be like that, but everywhere.
I don't know how you're watching this anime's episodes, but keep in mind that bakemonogatari has 15 episodes: the last three were released as an OVA.
I'm a HUGE pasta lover! When I'm not on a low carb diet pasta is prolly my main carb source! Whole wheat pasta that is, I actually don't find it tasting much different than "normal" pasta! So whole wheat pasta is a perfect healthy tasty carb source!  By creative and make some tasty sauce and throw in your lean meats! Can't get any better!
Can someone tell me the artist(s) name that sings "Don't let me be misunderstood" ? (=
Aaahhh... Marteria... my secret rapper crush from Rostock :3
do this 1 m8 plz
Pics or it didn't happen
black ring for swingers? care to elaborate?
awesome. Thank you!
Looks like you made something nice.
Leave right wingers out of it. IMO it would probably be an over sensitive liberal that would react like this
When discussing the realism of Downton abbey, it's important to keep in mind that it's not just based on a general view of the time periods and social classes as a whole. There are real life role models for some of the characters.   The central story is based around the in-law family of the writer Julian Fellowes, his wife, just like Mary in the story, was unable to inherit her father's title.   There will be aspects which are atypical for the setting and character types, but which fit the real life narratives on which pars of it are loosely based. 
On the edges, lightweight and a bit ditzy. 
I had an orgasmic poo once twas a thing of beauty
I remember something like this someone built in a backyard in Oregon Hill. It wasn't as nice and made of wood but still pretty cool. 
[Part of him is in the updated version](http://www.hopewellstudios.com/components/com_virtuemart/shop_image/product/24e3bc8d376c8299dececc5619836453.jpg)
This thread.
"You're not getting your scholarship." 
Do you have a list that disprooves the theory? There are also several examples where the government is involved. For example roads which are subsidized, makes people able to afford big cars, and not carpool etc. It creates a mess, because the government interferes with the market forces.  The missisipy river case also has government involved because the pollution travels across borders. What is a mexican going to do against an american with his lawyers and shit in the back? You dont see polution being passed on from one american to the other without there being a dispute. But mexicans cant dispute americans that easily because government..
As a soccer fan, I'll always dig a #10 jersey. Still, I have a hard time seeing Nate giving up his number to anyone.
They should extend that to the media who are the biggest spy organisation in my country(uk) 
You alienate all other men out of the narrow idea that none of them are as perfect for you as your cousin is. You feel like he's the only one for you, but maybe that's because he's the only one you let exist. The foolish thing is that all of this is happening without you even having a romantic relationship with this person. You barely even get to visit him.  You're not betraying him if you talk to other guys. I mean, what's the worst that can happen if you open yourself up to meeting someone? Sure, there's some you won't like. Eventually, though, a guy will come along that you'll click with.  You're letting an unrealistic obsession keep you from living your life. That's unhealthy and an issue. Of course you think no one's out there — you're refusing to even take a look.  Open yourself up and try not to immediately compare everyone you meet to your cousin. I think you'll surprise yourself.  Best of luck to you.
Sorry, in michigan. 
To go to the extent of admitting that publicly, I'm gonna go ahead and guess he's more than just a little bothered by it haha.   But you're right, I didn't remember exactly what he said, just that he admitted it bothered him.
I seriously wonder how much of it though. 15 would be nice and probable but I seriously doubt we'll get 30, and probably auto and not custom. But I am excited nonetheless.
the name of the post is not relevant. a suggestion to jeb is still a minecraft suggestion and the title should be relevant to the post itself
You can't be a god if you can't even break platinum
The number I saw was .9 wins over the remainder of the season. So, based off of that, our improvement in the post-season is... not much at all.
Well, referring to your mother as an 'older woman' probably didn't get him any points in the 'trying to get laid' scheme of things.
ODB has been dead for 10 years. There is no more wu tang.   Burn in hell you fucking Mormon. Fuck Utah. I passed through Provo once, no smokes for eighteen year olds. Dickhead state troopers with fucking beehives on their cruisers kicking it and being faggots. 
If I used/needed the extensive coverage, I would make every effort to stay with Verizon. 
"You're good at taking it. On your feet!"
*With his free hand he lift himself up to her so he can kiss her fiercely once more, his hips begin thrusting in sync with hers*.
Thank you so much.
I haven't looked at all of them but as an example the General Retail one has tables for Casual Juniors. 
sorry to hear, where you from?
i dunno the centaur one with the double bleeps might be a contender
That kind of emphasizes my point even more.
get kratom is the mod's of sub reddit and the head line vendor.....so spamming for someone who is that for this reddit.....and someone saying it in a post asking about vendors......this is not spam...please learn the difference
Along with those two moments, my other favorite part was [seeing Ultraman crying in the corner of his cell. Just so satisfying!](/spoiler)
But in Southeast Asia (My only experience was in Thailand, so I can't speak for other countries) night markets are the legit thing, and day markets are just tourist traps. 
Wow, that's a real subreddit.
He said he had both in a previous post, I believe he even did his test run on Y. 
I love lilac.  http://m.pandawhale.com/post/8984/i-love-the-lilac-emma-watson-bad-lip-reading-gif  @ 1 min mark 
Seems less pedantic and more like, "Ok, I didn't understand."  It is what it is, though.
Plaque cannot be removed from pets' teeth even with brushing, much less by feeding them dry food.  Dry kibbles cannot crack formed plaque off of cats' teeth (or dogs' teeth for that matter).  Once plaque has actually formed, it remains there unless it is removed during a dental cleaning procedure.  Brushing pets' teeth can prevent plaque formation, but brushing/dry kibbles cannot remove plaque that has already formed.  And no, I have never bitten into an apple and left a bunch of plaque on it.  Neither have you.  No one has.  If that were true (it's not), I'd only ever take one bite of any apple, ever.
I weep that you don't have a splitting ice cream headache right now.  Revolution!
You are so lucky. Can't find anything on eBay for less than 60 buy it now. Awesome find.
My mom had these ceramic figurines that my grandma had given her years before.  She cherished them.  They sat atop a hutch in our living room for years, but one day when my mom was doing something near them, she accidentally bumped them, and they fell from the top of that hutch, breaking into a thousand little pieces.  She cried and cried and she swept up all the little pieces and threw them into the trash. Fast forward to that Christmas, and my little brother, who was maybe 10 or 11 at the time, hands her a box.  She opened it to find that he had taken that trash can, sorted through all the broken pieces one by one and glued them all together.  They weren't perfect, but my little bro did such an amazing job -- of course everyone in the house was moved at such an wonderful and thoughtful gift. That was a good 20 years ago; those ceramic figurines that my grandma gave my mom are still on display at my folks' house.  
New Jersey is amazing. Northern Jersey is beautiful and the view of New York beats living there. Great food, farms, shopping. Just enough suburb and city. 
Anyone else think it looks like the sun?
Hi there, i have an egg that matches your, could you help me to hatch it?   * Pokemon: Magikarp * Nickname: Red Wing * IGN:Menardi * FC: 2320-7427-9523 * Time zone: GMT-7
You still have ads. I get ads very rarely. I almost always get them when I watch a music video on a vevo channel.
http://i.imgur.com/DH8Ojjd.png
struggling old people stories? another one that stands out...there was this one time i had an old man call in looking to order Some viagra. no, im not even joking. im dead serious. not only did he call the wrong number but he would completely ignore me every time i would say that he called the wrong number and kept trying to place an order. lol  Nicest? these are rare but every once in a while i get those customers that are so relieved that i was able to resolve thier issue that ive had people offer to take me to Hawaii, European trips, wanting to send me cash as a tip and even had one offer to have phone sex with me. unfortunately i had to decline them all, even the phone sex lol
Discretion is supposed to be used in determining if something is against the law or not.  If the circumstances are the same then the decision of the cop should be the same.  All discretion means is having some limited authority in the interpretation of the law.  Choosing to let crimes slide for one person but not another is not discretion, it is corruption.  Even when its for "good" reasons like not ticketing people with military IDs. If the circumstances are the same, the outcome should be the same.  That is justice.
Written like Flashpoint never happened.  Oh Geoff Johns you.
Cause they won't let me post my yeard!!!!!!! lol that the only reason i made this thread. ha
Did he win or lose the fight?
[This video by Rigan Machado helped me a lot!](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=koW-YNHWqog)
I spent 23yrs to graduate high school, graduated college, get a normal job and will have to wake up and go to a job for another 30yrs. 
Fix the car. Don't take out a loan for a new car. 
Are you sure it's not USB 2.0? I haven't seen a USB 1.x device in a lonnnnggg time.
Last year I decided to wait for my QB in an auction league. Before I knew it the top 7 or 8 QBs we're taken and with a cap of about $10 I was being constantly outbid. In the end I got Eli and after week 1 I tanked about 4 weeks in a row after that before trading.
wow you had a beard at 12???
Some aid, maybe. Y'know, from that immense oil wealth?
1. Most plants do not have naturally occuring insecticides in them.  You just made that up.  Yes, there are some like potatoes but definitely not most. 2. http://www.nytimes.com/2003/03/09/nyregion/cuttings-a-frog-lends-a-hand-to-rhododendrons.html hahaha you were so funny with that Jurassic park joke - except you were wrong.  They are putting frog dna in rhododendrons and spider dna in potatoes.  http://www.nature.com/nbt/journal/v19/n6/full/nbt0601_573.html  Don't try to tell me we've been doing that for thousands of years. 3. The GMO tomato hit shelves in 1994.  It was the first commercially available GMO food.  The fact that it's no longer available doesnt mean anything.  Once a GMO food is out, it's out - progressively contaminating more and more non-gmo crops. http://gizmodo.com/the-original-genetically-modified-tomato-youll-never-ea-559924439
it's a trash can...
This is silly Christians should know better.  The only idols god will use to heal are golden calves. 
video games are fucking serious business 
Who would have thought? 
Pam got tanner xD all that sun
There's a number of people selling just the Portal on eBay. 
if you don't make money in the first place, no one can steal it. sounds good.  I'm pretty sure the the gain is higher than the loss of a transparent container. Also: I prefer my coffee bar looking friendly, not like a high security something 
I have it set up now, but I have an issue. I'm using OBS to broadcast and that's all good, set up a 1500 MS delay and all.  But how do I listen to the LIVE audio, not the buffered one on the computer. I have the HDMI output going to a DVI, so I'm curious how to fix this.  Do I buy some splitter or is there a way to send RAW audio to my desktop?
6.99$ would be perfect to avoid abuse.
Well I passed nuclear proliferation after this so i dropped the games only nuke on his capital 10 turns before the science win and took him out. Shouldn't have disrespected.
We know hamas is using civilian areas to launch  attacks from. This is an unarguable fact. Israel has a right to wipe out its aggressors. Israel has to choose between not attacking, and continue to be a victim, or Israel can attack and palestine will incurr civilian casualties,  which are solely the fault of hamas, not of Israel. Hamas knows exactly what it is doing,  and it is successfully marrying it's own citizens for nothing more than propaganda that Israel is "intentionally killing kids"...  Which couldn't be further from. The truth.   Israels practice of "roof knocking" is an example of Israel trying to warn civilians and allow them to leave.  Israel is also allowing for undeserved humanitarian cease fires,  to which hamas re-engages.   Israel does not want to kill civilians, if they did,  there would be mary more dead civilians. But this I literally a war. It is close quarters,  and the "enemy" is using human shields.   What would you have Israel do instead?   I do not wish war or death on anyone,  but it is my opinion that Israel has waited long enough,  has done their due diligence to avoid civilian deaths whilst still aggressively attacking it's "enemy".   Israel has tolerated quite a bit,  more than any reasonable nation should have to tolerate.   To refute you're analogy,  if blowing your head off is the only way to get you to stop punching me,  then I will blown your head off.  If you put your family in front of yourself as a shield,  then I will go through your family to get to you. I will stop you from punching me, it is your choice to shield yourselves with innocdmts. I will not be held captive by your decisions to use human shields,  my safety is priority. The safety of you family is a distant second,  especially when you are attacking me from behind them. Israel is not going out of its way to intentionally kill Innocents, and if anyone thinks that Israel is intentionally killing innocents,  that is their own sick fantasy.   I appreciate your discussion,  thank you. 
Cool beans. Now I get to figure out a time I can use it in a conversation. 
They said in the stream that you will only take bonus damage from one minion, no matter how many you hit with your third skill. So, it'll never go above 200+50% from a minion explosion.
Whenever this type of stories come up there's a small part of me that just wants them to be right. I mean, it's really easy to cheer for the lone boy getting screwed by the large company.   However, in 2 years of reading this type of comments, I'd seen one where Riot was legitimately wrong (it was a couple days ago, when they misread a ticket and sent a completely off-topic automated response).   So, yeah... The odds do not favor you. But well everyone is innocent until proven guilty. Let's wait for the smite.
Phantoms like a motherfucker! 
Graze on them like cattle.
&gt;Should I see a doctor?  YES  &gt; I'm only 15,   At best its nothing, at worse you need medical help. talk to your parents. 
That's all info that has been superseded. All currently known info points toward pilot suicide.
I'm still not seeing your point in all this. Until verified (ie: canon) they are whatever the players impose on them
except they're really not, though.
You have a lot of fear. The vast majority of people think those things are wrong. There are plenty of people who think it is right to stop those kinds of people, in fact, we have institutions devoted to stopping people who think those kinds of things are right.
He's so good he manages to miss Shen'a Q. 
soundcloud holmes.
Yeah I'd say the book ramps up to be a little advanced, and not quite as beginner friendly as it comes off.  However, since you've already done codecademy and read John Duckett's book, it seems like you may just have to scour the internet to piece together information until you understand the material. At this point in your learning it's going to be hard to find all the info you want from one resource. 
Damn, that's disappointing :(. We'll miss you terribly!
I'm gonna have to call in my expert on iron here, just gotta be sure this is legit...
Added, thanks!
Christ...
My 2nd grade pic is just like #26... I sneezed just before the shot, so you can even see the phlegm flying away...
Truthfully even though I know thats exactly what it is, I'm totally for it. I feel like the only limitation should be so that it doesn't ruin central park by blocking the sun.
Was on mobile. Yay Google Keyboard. I'll fix it. 
NO http://stream1.gifsoup.com/view2/2248986/george-takei-wink-o.gif
If you're in US, no. 'Merica!
Not by any measure of accuracy.
Hm... parallel dimension with cell service to the other side?
HNNNNNNNNNNNNNGGGGHHHH cant wait
Costa :-P 
If I were you guys, I sure wouldn't place any bets on a violation of conservation of momentum.  There aren't many laws as solid as that one -- it applies even at the quantum level!  My first guess would be that it's a measurement problem (since shocking results usually are).  My second guess is that the thrust is explained by something being emitted that we can't see (electromagnetic radiation, electrons, ionized air, something).  My third guess is that it's a hoax or prank story of some kind.  The hypothesis that a new physical principle has been discovered that overturns all of modern physics, relativity, and quantum mechanics is, like, maybe my fourth guess.  I suppose.  EDIT: Forgot to say: my skepticism does not mean that I object to these tests being carried out.  You don't learn new things if you don't try crazy things sometimes.  More power to them and let's see some more tests.
&gt;  This has been documented  Link?
I couldn't make it past the part where she called herself a chubby bunny then went off on a tangent about how it makes her feel cute. Fuck that shit, not even worth my time.
Managed to watch Lords of Dogtown today. Fucking awesome movie about some kids from Venice, CA who basically helped skateboarding become a huge thing. At some point I'm gonna watch Dogtown and the Z-boys, which is a documentary about those dudes. Fucking awesome stuff.   Went and got some [pics](http://imgur.com/a/mx1J4) earlier. Also met a cat. So that was neat. 
Me too, and I'm a straight male.
C4 does not disappear after switching classes, it is my favourite way how to kill sunderers and tanks which are difficult to kill otherwise, C4 is set off by Fury's splash damage.  No its not gonna be 30 seconds. Your reaction time starts at the moment you hear explosion, because you will never see it coming. At that moment i can drop lower and finish sunderer with explosive xbow and grenade launcher. If you can react and start repairing within 3-4 seconds after initial C4 explosion, GG to you. This is probably riskiest move and i only use it when i cannot access the sundy with wraith. But then again, nobody ever uses mineguard so i don't really need to do this like.... ever.  no, i drop right next to your sunderer, throw sticky and 2 mines instantly after it, i need only 1 second for this. That's not enough for you to even realise im around.  Also, shield will not be THE loadout. Blockade armor will still be superior on battle buses while mineguard will be still way to go for gate-crashers. NAR will be just as useless as it always was.
"Embaraçoso" may also work depending on the state you're in.
I know, but it's just the bare minimum. It won't take OP a week to get the concept of variables, loops, functions ... then will move on. Because the site teaches very little, in other word. Just the basic. Besides, nothing in the site teaches anything outdated to the point that may be seen dangerous.
That's as far as I ever got. I'm waiting to see if child me was worse at this than Dan.
&gt;so that a farmer can plant multiple strains of a GMO crop, for cheap, to insulate against biodiversity risks.  We do, just not in the same field. As I explained before, Monsanto licenses its Bt trait to Dow and others, so they make their own Bt corn. And farmers often buy seeds from several different companies, because farmers have many, many fields often times. They'll plant some fields with Monsanto, some with Pioneer, some with Bayer, etc. There is no monopoly to speak of. Any of the farmers I work with every day will tell you the same.
No laser cutting at all, just with my hand tools.
Why would you censor their name when it's posted on amazon for anyone to see? 
I always felt there was something 'different' about Jeff Immelt !
It ended 31st for Japan, so 12-13 hours ahead of the US
...NOW MY TURN TO FINISH
You think.
&gt; ELI5  Watch the Penn and Teller "BS" episode on Global Warming for a funny explanation. 
Are the LA Kings even good?
Fuck my own rules (/r/Anarchism). Nethrai win again! To put it in perspective, Caleb was, with his love Ophelia, in a cult, the Cabal, worshipping the Chernobog. he was killed, Ophelia too and two others "chosen" (you'll meet them in Blood 2 The Chosen.). Rising from his grave, Caleb seek revenge against the Cabal and is going to do something epic: He'll kill a god. If you never played BLOOD, get it right fucking now on gog.com . Please [Have a look at this mastepiece.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5HUdd9wsRb0)  And Nethrai, please PM me for the last win of this evening. Thank you everyone.
Thank you so much! I SERIOUSLY appreciate that! This is seriously my favorite sub reddit haha
He is too fabulous for the meta so riot buffed other supports
So Uh...  That's exactly my spurs quota.  Get out of my head
As you can see it's also early days for the bots development too! Here I have fixed the problem for the next daily of truncating the tip, this one is still messed up.  Here is your tip +/u/dogetipbot 70 doge verify
LULZ SICK TAGE BURH!!!!!111!!!!ONE #SWAG #420 #YOLO #BLESSED
Thanks for checking out my site and the feedback on it. Cant believe I missed a word on the front page...
You know you can check the view count on imgur right? As of 4 hours since submission, it has 150,000. So it's a new 20,000 for each half hour, but it'll drop a lot once it falls off the front page. The closest rated link on page 2 has 500,000. You can buy half a million pre-roll video ad views on YouTube for an average of about $1,500.  Can you orchestrate reddit frontpages like this for $1,500? Probably. But each one is a mere scratch in the marketing budget of a company like GoPro that someone at the agency has to devote their finite attention to.
My guess is Jungle Vals (Vallisneria Americana).
  Can I have a Wailmer? Edit: I'm so sorry my IGN is Juan and I put up a lv.1 female Gligar
So is it mechanical?  Page won't load at school.
I see, good luck future barrister. 
400 damage to all enemies is somewhat a lie, it does 100 base damage at level 1 (400 at MAX RANK) and it has very low base damage which does not hit hard until very late game.
His slash down there doesn't look half bad either. .307/.387/.422/.809.  That being said, I'm not sure how much that will translate to the Big Leagues. (It's not always a sure fire thing).
You must Eradicate the BBB. Remove its stain from the face of the earth!
You can turn right on a red arrow. The red arrow means you are in a turn-only lane.  [RCW 46.61.055(3)(c)](http://apps.leg.wa.gov/rcw/default.aspx?cite=46.61.055) :  &gt;(c) Vehicle operators facing a steady red arrow indication may not enter the intersection control area to make the movement indicated by such arrow, and unless entering the intersection control area to make such other movement as is permitted by other indications shown at the same time, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering a crosswalk on the near side of the intersection control area, or if none, then before entering the intersection control area and shall remain standing until an indication to make the movement indicated by such arrow is shown. **However, the vehicle operators facing a steady red arrow indication may, after stopping proceed to make a right turn from a one-way or two-way street into a two-way street or into a one-way street carrying traffic in the direction of the right turn; or a left turn from a one-way street or two-way street into a one-way street carrying traffic in the direction of the left turn; unless a sign posted by competent authority prohibits such movement.** Vehicle operators planning to make such turns shall remain stopped to allow other vehicles lawfully within or approaching the intersection control area to complete their movements. Vehicle operators planning to make such turns shall also remain stopped for pedestrians who are lawfully within the intersection control area as required by RCW 46.61.235(1).
Favorite musician died, commence sadness. However, it took on an unintended and dark turn when three years to the day of my account being created, a certain young California kid with the same name decided to commit a shooting. 
Nothing better than seeing the packers destroy the hopes and dreams of bears fans.
I'd like to see AC3 redone with a decent draw distance and frame rate.  And a new goddamn weapon wheel. Then I'd be happy.
Here you go again with the statistical thing, and your weird insistence that "less probable than" is synonymous with "cannot happen without the presence of".  And your backstory idea only makes sense with the character coming from a society where albinos are oppressed, of which there are none in Golarion.  Unless I suppose you count the Drow.
Cheer up, buddy. I love you!
*Anything* but PHP?
:(  so would it be OK for me to attack an Arab in Haifa because that was supposed to be reserved for Jews?
Bj2495 NA Silver 5 Jungle/supp  Looking for more league friends and maybe someone to duo with.
And Rocky through Rocky V... I smell a Marathon coming on...
Now only 2000 more comment karma! Hooray! 
Thanks! Changed.
Well, if this is a taxable account, then you might not want to sell the shares if doing so would incur a large capital gain. 
What else is a lie? The sketches? The watercolors? The giraffes?
111Million people disagree with you.
Do you need one of us to fake emergency call you, or is the date over?
this is perfect!!! Thank you so much, at this stage, I perfectly understand what is going on! damn, this phrase was really messing with my head! but now I pretty much understand it all.  今でとても分かります。ありがとうございます先生たち!
I like you. You should become the new Unidan, but without the disappointing vote fraud.
You misunderstand the reason. Certain organizations were named as crime ones and even mentions of them were banned in some countries. We must obey the rules because otherwise we get into lot of legal troubles over players who wish to be named in certain ways. 
Well an opinion's an opinion, and I'll admit they're not the most versatile, but to each his own.
Brb opening 13 cases, Inb4 13 negevs
But they will show others, and the evil will spread without you able to stop it :D  (It may not be cheesy, but it is "delicious")
YES  * 1 Couch co-op - I love playing games with my wife. Further it splits the gameplay between the gamepad and the television. Finally! Thank you!!!  * 2 Huge roster of Zelda characters - Dynasty Warriors, eh. Zelda game based on Dynasty Warriors, interested. With TONS of characters, sold!  * 3 Solid development team - I'm actually interested to see what kind of game comes out with all these creative synergies.  * 4 NOW ONLINE!?! - I love Lord of the Rings. EA's LOTR Conquest was poorly received but I enjoyed the hell out of the online because it was not your traditionally FPS. This has online too. I'm in, day one. Belated b-day gift from the wife. Thank you honey I love you.
It is a great song, but I think a trance version is something more people can dance to. http://youtu.be/-BmGG38l9B4?t=8m15s , his set at EDC 2014- killed it!
'There I was, swear to God, balls deep..."
Or "Noble".  They can save "Mystical" for the Indian, who of course is a Yogi or guru of some sort.
Yeah, but this never worked for me. Even if I do wind up in hell and it is torment for eternity, after a while I'll get used to it. No matter how horrific it is, I'll eventually become desensitised to it and there's only so much they can do: I'm going to hit a point where hell is just another day at the office.
awesome!!  i would like to start and organize giveaways for stellar as well, to help build an awesome community.  
God forbid someone make an original comment, the only thing I want to see on reddit are direct references to earlier posts repeated over and over for months on end. After all, that's the main reason why subreddits like /r/adviceanimals and /r/funny are regarded so highly quality-wise.
Yeah, I agree.  I should also clarify that it wouldn't be a bad thing for either spouse to go from full-time to part-time for a couple years while their child is really young and developing.  But the idea of women being stay-at-home moms just creates problems.  If the relationship ever gets abusive, she won't be able to buy an apartment, call an attorney or find a quality job with blank resume when she does leave that relationship.
You are another cheap human shield being used by the Israeli Propaganda Ministry for free.  Only stupid people shill for no money.
Incredibly cr*ass*. 
Thank you for this post.
I mean, have we seen them at the same place at the same time? ^(^this ^video ^doesn't ^count)
I have currently seen 54 movies in theater this year. Which would probably make for about 90 movies in theater only. Besides that I try to watch atleast one movie a week all by myself, so that adds up to about 140 movies a year.
#####THE WIZARD OF OZUNA!!
It would be nice if that's how it actually worked, but bureaucratic creep and compartmentalization essentially means that it never happens like that. Organizations like the CIA, with an estimated 20,000 employees and a multi-billion dollar budget, are behemoths, operating with an extremely, almost infinitely complex web of interlocking wheels and cogs. These kinds of bureaucratic institutions exist to perpetuate themselves, to become more and more complex in structure and form.   The D/CIA certainly has an amount of power over their organization's overall direction, but they really just nudge it in very small degrees.  "The bureaucracy is expanding to meet the needs of the expanding bureaucracy."  -Civilization IV
It was just a joke...
That's fucking rape you piece of shit. You should be in prison right now. That explains why you can't keep a wife. 
I wouldn't be concerned with extra headroom, personally, the co2 will still blanket the beer. Given the extra headroom, blowoff shouldn't be a concern ;)
My card is a picture from football 
Solid playing, great song - you looked and sounded relaxed.  You're right to be happy with how it came out.
An AC2 PS4 version would require a lot more though because the game is older... just not old enough to warrant a complete makeover. It wouldn't be a simple remastering in 1080p 60fps, it would have to be basically a complete remake from the ground up. Games like TLOU and GTA V aren't that far away from what we're getting from PS4 titles, the leap in technology isn't so big this time. Like [this](http://www.gamepur.com/files/images/2014/the-last-of-us-ps4-vs-ps3-comparison.jpg) for instance - it looks better, but they aren't worlds apart. To someone who doesn't know much about games, they'd probably just think they made his hair lighter. Meanwhile AC2's graphics, particularly the character models... well, [they don't look that great.](http://fc02.deviantart.net/fs70/i/2012/350/0/6/ezio_auditore__assassin__s_creed_2__by_nylah22-d5o8fqr.png) They would have to pretty much do everything again from scratch for it to look good. And it's not old enough for that to really be worth doing. It's not so old that it doesn't hold up well, and not new enough that it could simply get a facelift like TLOU did.  If any game deserves a remake it's AC1.
#Freedinokid2014
that's how i run mine.  based on the little i know and the component selection... sounds like you took your car to a pretty high end place?  is this going to run you 4-5k?  oh... one thing i overlooked... your source?  are you going to be keeping the stock head unit?  a bit10 may be better in that situation....  you're going to have a great sounding system, you're on the right track btw  edit:  75wpc is respectable but i personally like to go 125+ just because you usually get a bump in sq because you're raising the ceiling.   you will have your volume down lower, playing in a cleaner part of the noise curve.   it's like running a 200 hp car at 75 mph vs a 100 hp car at 75 mph.  both will do it, one will do it easier.  but still... that is bit of a bad example since 75 wrms x4  for your front stage isn't bad by any stretch. I did miss the part where you were getting it installed.  if thats the case i would probably stick with what he has there.  it'll all be warrantied and so will the installation if he needs to replace it....(well.. you could bring in another sub, since that would be cheap diy to replace yourself in the future if anything went wrong)  
I like how some of the people in the background are like, "Yeah, whatever."
Dat liquid cooler, OC motherboard with locked CPU
Add a T to the beginning and the problems solved. 
Why do they have to fall? Why can't they all be like Shitty Watercolour or \_Vargas_?
Hey Kim, you look silly.
Don't be so dramatic
:D
Someone tried to hail me, I didn't know how to accept :(  But I used txt to say hi.
I could use an invite please   GT PFKnone
http://i.imgur.com/UaZtzkr.jpg http://www.theworks.co.uk/p/calligraphy/calligraphy-set/4897021650583
Reminds me of when I recently rewatched Local Hero ((1983)) and realised that [spoiler](#s "after Danny tells Marina that the town will be turned into an oil terminal, and she just says with utter conviction, 'no, I don't see that happening here. I don't see that at all.' And then right after that comes the aurora and the turnaround point of the film, and the place is indeed saved.") It really added to the careful, ephemeral feel of magic that made the film so great.
Tell her to tell her they're going to do something else. You really think she's going to respect a man who allows himself to go look at naked males for pussy? She probably said that as a joke.
Yeah but then she grew up
It's all ogre now. 
150
Describing Georgia State as "cash-strapped" is laughable. Maybe they would have some cash if they didn't spend it buying buildings they don't need... 
Giveaways are always nice :)  I think it would be a great one [](#p-happy)
I liked Ezio best. Everyone always talks about how whiny and immature he is, but he starts the series at like 20 years old with his brother and father being murdered and his mother being raped. That whining goes on to become everything he does, and I just enjoy the storyline and his character progression from that whiny young adult to the most hardcore 50 year old assassin ever.  Altair was okay, and yeah, AC3 was feh. Connor kinda sucked and the storyline wasn't that great.  I haven't played blackflag.  I just really like Ezio.
Holy fuck! Wow!!! I haven't seen any of your previous posts, but I am an instant fan!!!
I'm just a bird owner:  Bird's are not domesticated animals.  They are... hit or miss pets.  Sometimes you can have birds that seem to get along great... other times you need to be careful they don't chew each other's feet off.  Some will never bite, others will become territorial and display nesting habits... these birds can be just as aggressive as the worst attack dogs.  A bird in the wild, will just fly away from these kinds of problems.  When they are stuck in a cage?  Some birds just go crazy.  
Once was enough, thank you very much. 
I kept scrolling to find a scrubs reference, I almost lost hope. 
Yes, they are both neutrals. 
Rockstar's full of them.  Seriously, some of my favorite quotes are from John Marston and Niko Bellic.
Doge has it's own currency already, Dogecoin, which sponsored a car in NASCAR  So yeah, probably going to be hard to get rid of doge.
Also true, we give them more leeway than any other nation as far as using our weapons technology. We give them tons of money and then allow them to test weapons systems in the US with unmatched levels of cooperation. 
http://m.imgur.com/warUHC5
He's not asking for your opinion on the matter. Just an answer.
Lowballed better than throwing it down the god damn middle :P.
you are forgetting akhi and jazallah khair
No, look up Cloyd he had one good game. Other than that, especially his time in Philadelphia, has been pretty bad. 
Clean - *Adj* - Only smoking weed and meth. But not buying meth just you know like, doing it with your friends who have the meth.
Oh... Gurl...
I don't think some of you realize the amount of money a lot of people have had to sacrifice for Obamacare.  All you see is the fact that certain people get something for free.   I'm not disagreeing with the prior condition portion of the act but what I am saying is that there are many people legitimately negatively affected by this and you refuse to acknowledge them.
Lol im 6 foot 6 and I always sit next to small people so I can stretch my legs more hahah
Blue mountain state wasn't that bad. But for you're bored I recommend it. 
names?
pls
Either that I was in a group that got a bill passed in my state. or that I got honorable mention in a national science competition.
New Orleans! Tacky, overpriced souvenir stores.
I cant personally as I am just there to edit it. Master will be back by around 9 so ill have him do it when he gets here
I  Hate  U
Exactly, because Hamas wants to see as many dead Palestinians as possible. It helps them in the international media. What they don't realize is that they are directly responsible according to international law  for doing so (I can cite the laws they are in violation of if anyone is interested). 
So a bunch of shit covered republicans are going to go and try to smear the president with it and somehow we're not going to notice they are still covered in it themselves. The disgrace here are the house republicans who cannot find a single thing better to do then continue their "One Term President" campaign even though it completely failed like everything else they do now. It's like they truly believe they are behind some curtain and no one can see what they're doing. 
I fully agree with everything you say. The bathrooms would be a major boon. More courts would be gteat, but that is a very easy fix if he could have the long lease. I'm just hoping the city wise up and realizes it is so much more valuable than a parking lot.
Not as impenetrable hardness no
Penis.
How does it know who is streaming? Does it auto update with active streams or is this a predetermined list?
This is a little random, but making the environment more welcoming.  The meeting I used to attend was a candlelight meeting, which I've only ever seen the one.  It was on sat. night and they would light candles and we would talk and share in the near darkness.  It made it feel less judgmental and more comforting. 
Not sure, but I think humans get additional dialog regarding belinda's funeral when talking to kasmeer before talking to the pale tree.
Nah not really. I've got MP-32's that I love so I really just want the cash for a trip this fall.
TIL what faygo is. I'm nearly 30, been to Michigan probably 10 times and had no idea. 
Wow fucking terrible decision. If I was Demarcus, I'd wreck the league in the upcoming season for this disrespect. 
It would. The thing with assault though often a lot of jurisdictions and courts combine the charges so you can be charged with "assault and battery" and it's up for the prosecutor and judge to figure out how what you did fits the charges.   Everyone has left out destruction of private property/vandalism. The signs aren't worth much but it's applicable same as if you slashed the tires on their vans.
Added you and i'm online.
Whatever happened to honoring your contract? Why are NFL players so greedy?
YES! this is beautiful. perfect example of having fun while respecting others.  the handicap thing is nice and some courses even do it, but it'll never be enforced at 99% of the courses.  for example, who's to say the 15+ handicap plays from the white tees on the first tee and then switches to the tips once on the 2nd hole?  Rangers really need to be in abundance on courses and strictly enforcing rules, but it won't happen because they feel like dicks and it's not like they're getting paid $30 an hour to be a ranger.  they're getting paid $10 an hour so they don't care all that much and i don't blame them.  my buddy is great. he won't even take practice swings. just get up to the ball and hit it 20 yards, pick it up, practice from my ball or just give up on the hole and drink if he thinks he's taking too long.
Definitely more on the romantic side for us, not sexual or casual. We just get to take a quiet couple minutes and wash each other and its so nice
Shut the fuck up Ruth.
My fiancée is Mennonite. Her family is Mennonite. I've never heard of this.
Do you mind if I link you to some old threads? [Here's the section in the FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/wiki/antiquity#wiki_the_trojan_war) on the subject, and here are what I think are the best of the posts that I've written: [number one](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/29z87i/what_details_did_homer_get_right_or_wrong_about/ciq8xuj), [number two](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/1rjij8/do_we_know_for_sure_that_troy_existed/cdnx6i6).  The upshot is: "it's not impossible that there was a Trojan War, but the available Bronze Age evidence does not *corroborate* the historicity of the war -- it only tells us that it's not *completely* impossible". Going beyond that involves weighing up probabilities, more than evidence as such.  By all means ask follow-up questions. And it's always possible that someone may have something new to add in this thread.
Your submission was removed because it looks like you're posting music without a correct title.   The correct format is:  **Artist Name - Song Name [genre]** [optional year] Optional extra text   Check your post now. Does it have spaces around the dash " - ", and does it have the [genre]?   Forgetting these points are almost definitely why it was removed.   Here are some examples of correct titles:   &gt; 808 State - ex:el (full album) [Breakbeat] [1991] This is a classic  &gt;   &gt; A$AP Rocky (feat. Schoolboy Q) - PMW (All I Really Need) [Rap / Hip-Hop] [2013]   You will need to delete this post before submitting again (click on delete above).  ---  **If you are not posting music, please [message the mods](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FMusic) to get approved!**   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FMusic) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Complisult it's part insult and part compliment... He invented it, I coined the term. See what i did there? That was an Explanabrag :) From my favorite TV show of all time. [source](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8_nMrJJFQ8s)
The Canadian healthcare system is bullshit.  It is illegal to provide private healthcare.  The entire healthcare industry is controlled by a government monopoly.  The system consumes roughly 33% of government revenue, and is predicted to reach 100% of government revenue in the next 50 years should nothing change.  Despite the huge spending, basic treatments have huge wait times.  An MRI takes about 6 months, unless you pay $800 and get the MRI in the US - how's that for equality?  Emergency room wait times are usually around 4-5 hours in big cities.  Roughly a fifth of Canadians do not have a family doctor - how's that for equality?  Wait times for breast cancer surgery are about 1 month in the most dangerous cases.
Just like any government. They all usually offer the "protection racket ".
Oh it will still be fast as heck, but an 850 is cutting edge and blazing fast.  It's starting to bump up against the limits of SATA III.  There's no reason to drop that kind of money on one if you can get a cheaper model for the same effect.
Think of it as 3 *bonus story* missions. As in single player missions. That's unrelated to the original campaign.
http://i.imgur.com/7pAE4cy.png
ALSO REMEMBER, DO NOT DRIVE IMPAIRED AFTER REPEATEDLY VIOLATING AGREEMENTS WITH YOUR EMPLOYER.
Looks like the retarded people on social media is doing more than just affect their lives. It's now affecting global geopolitical events. 
When in doubt about math I simple answer 42.
a tenor guitar
Not with Windows 7 but with 8 you can use the App History tab in the newer Task Manager and check the Options &gt; Show History for All Processes entry and it will show info for every process run on the system.  23-24% for 8GB @ 54 processes does sound fairly decent, the thing about Windows is that even with an excess amount of RAM available, it doesn't always use it, I have 16GB in my system and at the moment it is clocking about 7.1GB in use or 44%.  It's honestly nothing to worry about, have you run a few virus scans using MSE, MalwareBytes or other AVs?
Yea now he is restricted, but I remember Pettine saying we are going to let Johnny be Johnny. And then a couple weeks later him saying he needs to take it easy.
Thank you, and I'm sorry Chief didn't get to go live with you! I'll be sure to let you know if I come across any of the others.
When I do it I seem to have a heightened level of euphoria and I would prefer it over pulling an all nighter on a binge! Haha I don't do this often though.
Obviously so Hamas brings more civilians in.
Dat fine ass on that potty tho
This x1000.  And I think people in internet fandom tend to forget that casual readers (most readers) barely pick up on R+L=J and for most it isn't until Feast/Dance. You know, for people who *don't* read the books through five times and come to message boards everyday like I do, R+L=J seems really juicy and satisfying. I even know of a casual reader who didn't pick up on it, despite knowing there was some question about Jon's parentage.
What's up with not using Ichrio?
Yeah, I played through it with 60FPS no Problems at all... LOLZ
Los gatos, definitivamente. Son creaturas muy curiosas e inquisitivas, casi meditadores natos. Además muy independientes.  Me gustan muchos los perros también y de niño siempre tuvimos en casa su buena compañía. Pero los gatos son tan enigmáticos que lo pondría en primer lugar.
Not sure if it's on netflix but Herr Lehmann is a great German film
I was coming here to say I have it too, it's a useful guy.
Hell yea Italy!
Bingo
I think he's destructive enough on his own.
Notice that Ragen wrote her own bio in which she describes herself as a "trained researcher, three-time National Champion dancer and marathoner". Don;t you have to actually finish a full marathon to be a marathoner?
Alexander Pimm / Shinigami / 10th Div. 4th seat  P.S. updated to show my placement  P.P.S. PANDA RAWKS \m/ 
You're not wrong, you're just an asshole.
The buildings did not progressively "collapse" that's not what actually occurred, in reality.  You seem to forget about the remaining undamaged structure, and what happened to it, in the case of the north tower, 95 stories worth, when the only difference in time between a free fall through nothing but air and the path of maximal resistance - is about 4 seconds. One two three four.   As to "buckling" - just watch videos of the north tower destruction. The top section of the building simply blew up and apart, leaving little more than mere atmosphere above the remaining 95 stories of undamaged structure.   What you are asking us to believe is impossible and violates the laws of motion.
People like you makes this world a little better everyday. A big thank you from the bottom of my heart :)
/r/imgoingtoget72virginsforthis
That's like, his opinion, man.
turn it into feral when you hit 29 stacks otherwise you're losing value
I think PJ was just born around that time. Really rough times for the dude.
There is no reason to dislike an honest cop.
But a crankbait or a spinner work so well.
And we still have the best record in baseball. Funny how that works. 
god id be so happy, just 2 more
It's still very expensive.
I work in an electronics department. You wouldn't believe how many casuals come in looking for "Skyrim Online" for Xbox or Playstation. 
**CriesAfterSex**  ;)) I can support u bb
we find out the whole story is an acid trip inside the head of BenJen Stark, who is actually everyone.
I wasn't aware that PetSmart online gift cards were only redeemable online. That seems a little ridiculous. Anyway, if you will PM me your email address, I'll send a PetCo gift card asap.
It it as if their life goes back to when they were a baby. From old people to adults to adolescent to childs to baby and then their life ends..
Give me a good price if you change your mind :3
Intentional ref, btw: https://twitter.com/AgnesGarbowska/status/494658943185326080
1. Introversion is not the same as shyness. It just means we need to think hard about how and when we'll expend energy with others and how and when we'll find time to re-energize with ourselves.  2. There are loads of positions that help people that don't require interacting with people. I've found that I'm really good at communicating highly technical and personal information clearly and succinctly in ways that respect the customers of the organizations I work for, so I write for a living. I write copy and educational materials and a whole bunch of other things and super-use the empathy card in order to do what I do. The audience has no clue about me. It's a thankless job, but I get to rock a bunch of INFPness and that desire to be helpful in doing so.
Miranda Devine. If ever there was a commentator that was blind to anything that doesn't suit her [two minutes hate](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Two_Minutes_Hate) - it's her. Well, and Bolt - I'm not entirely convinced the two aren't the same person with a different pen name.  
I saw a video yesterday where someone managed to pop on a minion wave and then jumped over the wall (it was at bot side).. That's quite crazy!
Awesome!  I need that mount! You guys are amazing!
Rofl?
It's a guy, but that could be your thing for all I know.
You didn't get the job.
Its not.
Darude-sandstorm
What do they call a Whopper?   I dunno I didn't go to Burger King.
What do you mean? An African or European swallow?
Turtles are awesome. 
I'm gonna wait to watch this when I see Guardians of the Galaxy tonight.
The  just add option to "requeue if matchmade with muted/reported person"  I'd gladly just wait another 5 minutes to not get matchmaked with ppl I reported or muted
to each his own.
I think that's still three separate hits, though, so it wouldn't count for the overkill.
How do you find out about these LANs?
lets first wait and see how he fares. 
Ah ha... Thats a question for brass.   Between you and me, hell no.  To begin with, they don't seem to communicate vocally or  telepathically, just through their hosts. This will make peace talks a nightmare.   They're also non-humanoid. Despite what Star Fleet says, we have a lot of xenophobia surrounding non-humaniod species. Sure, Picard or even that loose canon Janeway will shake hand a tentacle in the name of peace but there are plenty of incidences of poor or disastrous first contact with non-humanoids. I wouldn't trust have the officers I know near an energy based life form.  And let's not forget that the last encounter with these Neural Patasites.  Ask any Admiral and they'll talk about good will, but most would turn their phasers to kill at first sight of one of these.
&gt; I don't understand why people believe this   &gt; people who have no idea what they're talking about   I think you do
To be fair to Bill, I'd probably just snapped and attacked her if I'd been in his shoes and under that much stress. I wonder if he really wouldn't have just jumped on a bomb if I hadn't been relying on him to run me out of the place at the time.  Aaw, I just thought of something... the feels in the last chapter will be equalled or bettered by the feels when he actually finds out you're OK. SO MUCH FEELS CANNOT HANDLE ALL THESE FEELS
Ah... Sorry. As soon as I got the wi-fi back up my power goes out XD
This comment makes me laugh because it's logical but a throwaway account. Confusion.
I do love me the Gogg.  She was my first MG ever.  */sighs*   Speaking of which, you should totally spring for an MG if you like the Gogg!  It's a sturdy kit (the MG) with lots of room for fun customizations.   I really like the BANDAI logo on the shoulder, that seems to add a lot.  However, be wary of overdoing the streaking effect.  It's toeing the line of "too much" on the shoulders, but they look great right now.  Will you be adding the orange/rust color to the head?  The white looks really out of place on top of the orange/rust of the chest (I love how you did the chest, by the way; it looks great).   And props for the IC socket usage!
404'd
You seem very approachable! You shop at thrift shops and like to alter your clothing. You have dyed your own hair a few times and like to experiment with your looks (you've tried goth, emo, alternative, preppy, whatever). You probably have a few band shirts that you rotate between. You're a student?
ahhhh i switched to minimalist shoes last year... the first 2 runs were rough... but I haven't had shin splints or weird hip pains ever since I switched!!!! SO wonderful... shin splints had been an issue for me for like... almost 10 years. 
Ullr from teased picture!
Vocal minority on this subreddit absolutely hate high grade military weapons, more so on western weapons. Not sure. 
Do you have any other common interests? It's great she's passionate about something and enjoys sharing it with you.  You're just going to have to be honest and tell her to stop sending you links. Maybe she can send a link or two once a month instead. Meet somewhere in the middle.
I have never regretted missing something this much. I would have been a wreck seeing that live. 
I just feel bad because it's like "Hay hope your idea of fun hanging out is having me do makeup for 2+ hours while I qq about sweating!"
Warioland 3, Mario Tennis, Harry Potter and the Chamber of secrets, and Kirby's Tilt and Tumble.
coyotes OP
Every update = Solid gold.
You're real naive if you think there's a chance Josh Gordon is getting screwed because of secondhand smoke.
Does she have a single sister?!
A 280 and 280x are different GPUs. The 280 is a 7950 the 280x is a 7970. The 270x and 270 are the same GPU. And there is no point in getting a different amount of VRAM as it will use the smallest amount either way. 
What is project mayhem?
###Season 2 spoilers!!!  .  .  .  .  .  Uzo, I fell in and out of love with Crazy Eyes so many times this season. Even when she was being an absolute fucking twat, you made it so easy to remember that she was very human and why V had such an affect on her. Now that V is out of the picture, how will your character change next season? As an extremely sensitive person, will she suffer the loss of someone she grew very close to? Or will she shut it out and just go back to the way she was before?   Thanks for the ama! You make Suzanne one of the most versatile, relatable characters on the show. :)
Why hasn't McIlroy had problems?  Sure, he broke up with his girlfriend but that's nowhere near what TIger did.  Tiger is a PED user, drug addict and a sexual creep. 
Howard Stern actually laughs at people who are mentally retarded and brings them on the show to make money. Hey, at least I'm not as nasty a "bigot" as Stern. /sarc  I simply called stupid people, people who aren't actually retarded, "tards". Sue me.
I too have never even had the thought. This sounds like something you're better off letting go. Nobody will be asking in any case.
You really don't want to watch CNN.  It's downright shameful how awful they have become.
The loser must commit seppuku. 
I've met many black belts who returned to judo after 5 or even 10 year breaks, and even though they were rusty, no one really cared. You will not be judged or anything, especially if you let people know that it's been a while for you. If you received the rank of brown belt, then it's yours for life, whether you still practice or not. I am sure that if you train again you will catch up in no time.
Canucks fan?  Yes, they're special. Very special.
This is my fav track of theirs to date. Sounds borrowed from Massive Attack's "Mezzanine" days.
[the stargate](http://i.imgur.com/fXuSH2h.gif)  Just saw this movie the other night, enjoyed it.
